Florida, session 2026, SB7046.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 234 235 Section 1.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, 236 paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 72.011, Florida 237 Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (c) is added to subsection 238 (1) of that section, to read: 239 72.011âJurisdiction of circuit courts in specific tax 240 matters; administrative hearings and appeals; time for 241 commencing action; parties; deposits.â 242 (1) 243 (c)âA taxpayer may claim interest on a refund that is the 244 subject of an action filed under paragraph (a) contesting an 245 assessment or denial of refund of any tax, fee, surcharge, 246 permit, interest, or penalty only if such claim is asserted 247 concurrently with the action. 248 (2)(a)âAn action may not be brought to contest an 249 assessment of any tax, interest, or penalty assessed under a 250 section or chapter specified in subsection (1) more than 60 days 251 after the date the assessment becomes final. An action may not 252 be brought to contest a denial of refund of any tax, interest, 253 or penalty paid under a section or chapter specified in 254 subsection (1) more than 60 days after the date the denial 255 becomes final. The 60-day period to contest an assessment or a 256 denial that becomes final under this subsection may not be 257 waived or tolled. 258 Section 2.â(1)âThe amendments made by this act to s. 259 72.011, Florida Statutes, are remedial and clarifying in nature 260 and also apply to actions pending as of the effective date of 261 this section. 262 (2)âThis section shall take effect upon this act becoming a 263 law. 264 Section 3.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, section 265 125.0168, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 266 125.0168âSpecial assessments levied on recreational vehicle 267 parks regulated under chapter 513.âWhen a county levies a non-ad 268 valorem special assessment on a recreational vehicle park 269 regulated under chapter 513, the non-ad valorem special 270 assessment may shall not be based on the assertion that the 271 recreational vehicle park is composed comprised of residential 272 units. Instead, recreational vehicle parks regulated under 273 chapter 513 shall be assessed as a commercial entity in the same 274 manner as a hotel, motel, or other similar facility. A non-ad 275 valorem special assessment levied on a square footage basis may 276 not be levied against more than 400 square feet per recreational 277 vehicle parking space or campsite. 278 Section 4.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 279 163.387, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 280 163.387âRedevelopment trust fund.â 281 (2) 282 (c)âThe following public bodies or taxing authorities are 283 exempt from paragraph (a): 284 1.âA special district that levies ad valorem taxes on 285 taxable real property in more than one county. 286 2.âA special district for which the sole available source 287 of revenue the district has the authority to levy is ad valorem 288 taxes at the time an ordinance is adopted under this section. 289 However, revenues or aid that may be dispensed or appropriated 290 to a district as defined in s. 388.011 at the discretion of an 291 entity other than such district shall not be deemed available. 292 3.âA library district, except a library district in a 293 jurisdiction where the community redevelopment agency had 294 validated bonds as of April 30, 1984. 295 4.âA neighborhood improvement district created under the 296 Safe Neighborhoods Act. 297 5.âA metropolitan transportation authority. 298 6.âA water management district created under s. 373.069. 299 7.âFor a community redevelopment agency created on or after 300 July 1, 2016, a hospital district that is a special district as 301 defined in s. 189.012. 302 8.âA special district that levies ad valorem taxes on real 303 property predominantly to fund childrenâs services pursuant to 304 s. 125.901 or other legislative acts. 305 Section 5.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, section 306 166.223, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 307 166.223âSpecial assessments levied on recreational vehicle 308 parks regulated under chapter 513.âWhen a municipality levies a 309 non-ad valorem special assessment on a recreational vehicle park 310 regulated under chapter 513, the non-ad valorem special 311 assessment may shall not be based on the assertion that the 312 recreational vehicle park is composed comprised of residential 313 units. Instead, recreational vehicle parks regulated under 314 chapter 513 shall be assessed as a commercial entity in the same 315 manner as a hotel, motel, or other similar facility. A non-ad 316 valorem special assessment levied on a square footage basis may 317 not be levied against more than 400 square feet per recreational 318 vehicle parking space or campsite. 319 Section 6.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, section 320 189.052, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 321 189.052âAssessments levied on facilities regulated under 322 chapter 513.âWhen an independent or dependent special district 323 levies an assessment on a facility regulated under chapter 513, 324 the assessment may shall not be based on the assertion that the 325 facility is composed comprised of residential units. Instead, 326 facilities regulated under chapter 513 shall be assessed in the 327 same manner as a hotel, motel, or other similar facility. An 328 assessment levied on a square footage basis may not be levied 329 against more than 400 square feet per recreational vehicle 330 parking space or campsite. 331 Section 7.â(1)âThe amendments made by this act to ss. 332 125.0168, 166.223, and 189.052, Florida Statutes, first apply to 333 the 2026 assessment roll. 334 (2)âThis section shall take effect upon this act becoming a 335 law. 336 Section 8.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) and paragraph 337 (b) of subsection (10) of section 193.155, Florida Statutes, are 338 amended to read: 339 193.155âHomestead assessments.âHomestead property shall be 340 assessed at just value as of January 1, 1994. Property receiving 341 the homestead exemption after January 1, 1994, shall be assessed 342 at just value as of January 1 of the year in which the property 343 receives the exemption unless the provisions of subsection (8) 344 apply. 345 (3)(a)âExcept as provided in this subsection or subsection 346 (8), property assessed under this section shall be assessed at 347 just value as of January 1 of the year following a change of 348 ownership. Thereafter, the annual changes in the assessed value 349 of the property are subject to the limitations in subsections 350 (1) and (2). For the purpose of this section, a change of 351 ownership means any sale, foreclosure, or transfer of legal 352 title or beneficial title in equity to any person, except if any 353 of the following apply: 354 1.âSubsequent to the change or transfer, the same person is 355 entitled to the homestead exemption as was previously entitled 356 and: 357 a.âThe transfer of title is to correct an error; 358 b.âThe transfer is between legal and equitable title or 359 equitable and equitable title and no additional person applies 360 for a homestead exemption on the property; 361 c.âThe change or transfer is by means of an instrument in 362 which the owner is listed as both grantor and grantee of the 363 real property and one or more other individuals are additionally 364 named as grantee. However, if any individual who is additionally 365 named as a grantee applies for a homestead exemption on the 366 property, the application is considered a change of ownership; 367 d.âThe change or transfer is by means of an instrument in 368 which the owner entitled to the homestead exemption is listed as 369 both grantor and grantee of the real property and one or more 370 other individuals, all of whom held title as joint tenants with 371 rights of survivorship with the owner, are named only as 372 grantors and are removed from the title; or 373 e.âThe person is a lessee entitled to the homestead 374 exemption under s. 196.041(1); 375 2.âLegal or equitable title is changed or transferred 376 between husband and wife, including a change or transfer to a 377 surviving spouse or a transfer due to a dissolution of marriage; 378 3.âThe transfer occurs by operation of law to the surviving 379 spouse or minor child or children under s. 732.401; 380 4.âUpon the death of the owner, the transfer is between the 381 owner and another who is a permanent resident and who is legally 382 or naturally dependent upon the owner; or 383 5.âThe transfer occurs with respect to a property where all 384 of the following apply: 385 a.âMultiple owners hold title as joint tenants with rights 386 of survivorship; 387 b.âOne or more owners were entitled to and received the 388 homestead exemption on the property; 389 c.âThe death of one or more owners occurs; and 390 d.âSubsequent to the transfer, the surviving owner or 391 owners previously entitled to and receiving the homestead 392 exemption continue to be entitled to and receive the homestead 393 exemption; or 394 6.a.âUpon the death of the owner, the transfer meets all of 395 the following conditions: 396 (I)âThe owner held legal or equitable title to the property 397 and was entitled to and received the homestead exemption at the 398 time of death. 399 (II)âThe property is devised by a will to only one lineal 400 descendant of the owner, as these terms are defined in s. 401 731.201. 402 (III)âA lineal descendant makes the property his or her 403 homestead as of the second January 1 after the death of the 404 owner. 405 (IV)âThe lineal descendant files with the property 406 appraiser proof of his or her entitlement to continue the 407 decedentâs assessment by refiling and updating the homestead 408 application under s. 196.011. The decedentâs certificate of 409 death, a certified copy of the decedentâs will, a certified copy 410 of the order admitting that will to probate, and an affidavit 411 that the lineal descendant has inherited the real property 412 through that will, must be submitted with the application. 413 Submitting the documents required herein is prima facie evidence 414 of entitlement. If the lineal descendant has a prior homestead, 415 the filing of proof is deemed to be an abandonment of his or her 416 prior homestead property as of the date of the ownerâs death. 417 b.âThis subparagraph may not be construed to establish 418 homestead property for a descendant who is not otherwise 419 entitled. Subsection (8) may not be applied to a property 420 transferred pursuant to this subparagraph. 421 (10) 422 (b)âIf the property appraiser improperly grants the 423 property assessment limitation as a result of a clerical mistake 424 or an omission or on property deemed abandoned under 425 subparagraph (3)(a)6., the person or entity improperly receiving 426 the property assessment limitation may not be assessed a penalty 427 or interest. Back taxes shall apply only as follows: 428 1.âIf the person who received the limitation as a result of 429 a clerical mistake or omission or on property deemed abandoned 430 under subparagraph (3)(a)6. voluntarily discloses to the 431 property appraiser that he or she was not entitled to the 432 limitation before the property appraiser notifies the owner of 433 the mistake or omission, no back taxes shall be due. 434 2.âIf the person who received the limitation as a result of 435 a clerical mistake or omission or on property deemed abandoned 436 under subparagraph (3)(a)6. does not voluntarily disclose to the 437 property appraiser that he or she was not entitled to the 438 limitation before the property appraiser notifies the owner of 439 the mistake or omission, back taxes shall be due for any year or 440 years that the owner was not entitled to the limitation within 441 the 5 years before the property appraiser notified the owner of 442 the mistake or omission. 443 3.âThe property appraiser shall serve upon an owner that 444 owes back taxes under subparagraph 2. a notice of intent to 445 record in the public records of the county a notice of tax lien 446 against any property owned by that person in the county, and 447 such property must be identified in the notice of tax lien. The 448 property appraiser must include with such notice information 449 explaining why the owner is not entitled to the limitation, the 450 years for which unpaid taxes are due, and the manner in which 451 unpaid taxes have been calculated. Before a lien may be filed, 452 the person or entity so notified must be given 30 days to pay 453 the taxes. 454 Section 9.âEffective January 1, 2027, paragraph (a) of 455 subsection (1) of section 194.032, Florida Statutes, is amended 456 to read: 457 194.032âHearing purposes; timetable.â 458 (1)(a)âThe value adjustment board shall meet not earlier 459 than 30 days and not later than 60 days after the mailing of the 460 notice provided in s. 194.011(1); however, no board hearing 461 shall be held before approval of all or any part of the 462 assessment rolls by the Department of Revenue. The board shall 463 meet for the following purposes: 464 1.âHearing petitions relating to assessments filed pursuant 465 to s. 194.011(3). 466 2.âHearing complaints relating to homestead exemptions as 467 provided for under s. 196.151. 468 3.âHearing appeals from exemptions denied, or disputes 469 arising from exemptions granted, upon the filing of exemption 470 applications under s. 196.011. 471 4.âHearing appeals concerning ad valorem tax deferrals and 472 classifications. 473 5.âHearing appeals from determinations that a change of 474 ownership under s. 193.155(3), a change of ownership or control 475 under s. 193.1554(5) or s. 193.1555(5), or a qualifying 476 improvement under s. 193.1555(5) has occurred. 477 6.âHearing appeals relating to timely filing of tax returns 478 as required in s. 194.034(1)(j). 479 Section 10.âParagraph (b) of subsection (10) of section 480 196.011, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 481 196.011âAnnual application required for exemption.â 482 (10) 483 (b)âIf a homestead exemption is granted as a result of a 484 clerical mistake or omission by the property appraiser or 485 granted on property deemed abandoned under s. 193.155(3)(a)6., 486 the taxpayer may not be assessed a penalty or interest. Back 487 taxes shall apply only as follows: 488 1.âIf the person who received the homestead exemption as a 489 result of a clerical mistake or omission or on property deemed 490 abandoned under s. 193.155(3)(a)6. voluntarily discloses to the 491 property appraiser that he or she was not entitled to the 492 homestead exemption before the property appraiser notifies the 493 owner of the mistake or omission, no back taxes shall be due. 494 2.âIf the person who received the homestead exemption as a 495 result of a clerical mistake or omission or on property deemed 496 abandoned under s. 193.155(3)(a)6. does not voluntarily disclose 497 to the property appraiser that he or she was not entitled to the 498 homestead exemption before the property appraiser notifies the 499 owner of the mistake or omission, back taxes shall be due for 500 any year or years that the owner was not entitled to the 501 homestead exemption limitation within the 5 years before the 502 property appraiser notified the owner of the mistake or 503 omission. 504 3.âThe property appraiser shall serve upon an owner that 505 owes back taxes under subparagraph 2. a notice of intent to 506 record in the public records of the county a notice of tax lien 507 against any property owned by that person in the county, and 508 such property must be identified in the notice of tax lien. The 509 property appraiser must include with such notice information 510 explaining why the owner is not entitled to the homestead 511 exemption limitation, the years for which unpaid taxes are due, 512 and the manner in which unpaid taxes have been calculated. 513 Before a lien may be filed, the person or entity so notified 514 must be given 30 days to pay the taxes. 515 Section 11.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 516 196.031, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 517 196.031âExemption of homesteads.â 518 (1)(a)âA person who, on January 1, has the legal title or 519 beneficial title in equity to real property in this state and 520 who in good faith makes the property his or her permanent 521 residence or the permanent residence of another or others 522 legally or naturally dependent upon him or her, is entitled to 523 an exemption from all taxation, except for assessments for 524 special benefits, up to the assessed valuation of $25,000 on the 525 residence and contiguous real property, as defined in s. 6, Art. 526 VII of the State Constitution. Such title may be held by the 527 entireties, jointly, or in common with others, and the exemption 528 may be apportioned among such of the owners as reside thereon, 529 as their respective interests appear. If only one of the owners 530 of an estate held by the entireties or held jointly with the 531 right of survivorship or an owner who inherited an interest in 532 the property resides on the property, that owner is allowed an 533 exemption of up to the assessed valuation of $25,000 on the 534 residence and contiguous real property. However, an exemption of 535 more than $25,000 is not allowed to any one person or on any one 536 dwelling house, except that an exemption up to the assessed 537 valuation of $25,000 may be allowed on each apartment or mobile 538 home occupied by a tenant-stockholder or member of a cooperative 539 corporation and on each condominium parcel occupied by its 540 owner. Except for owners of an estate held by the entireties or 541 held jointly with the right of survivorship or an interest 542 inherited by a descendant, the amount of the exemption may not 543 exceed the proportionate assessed valuation of all owners who 544 reside on the property. Before such exemption may be granted, 545 the deed or instrument must shall be recorded in the official 546 records of the county in which the property is located. The 547 property appraiser may request the applicant to provide 548 additional ownership documents to establish title. 549 Section 12.âThe amendments made by this act to ss. 193.155, 550 196.011, and 196.031, Florida Statutes, first apply to the 2027 551 property tax roll. 552 Section 13.âSubsection (3), paragraph (b) of subsection 553 (4), and paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of section 196.081, 554 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 555 196.081âExemption for certain permanently and totally 556 disabled veterans and for surviving spouses of veterans; 557 exemption for surviving spouses of first responders who die in 558 the line of duty.â 559 (3)âIf the totally and permanently disabled veteran 560 predeceases his or her spouse and if, upon the death of the 561 veteran, the spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the 562 homestead and permanently resides thereon as specified in s. 563 196.031, the exemption from taxation carries over to the benefit 564 of the veteranâs spouse until such time as he or she remarries 565 or sells or otherwise disposes of the property. If the spouse 566 sells the property, the spouse may transfer an exemption not to 567 exceed 120 percent of the amount granted from the most recent ad 568 valorem tax roll to his or her new residence, as long as it is 569 used as his or her primary residence and he or she does not 570 remarry. 571 (4)âAny real estate that is owned and used as a homestead 572 by the surviving spouse of a veteran who died from service 573 connected causes while on active duty as a member of the United 574 States Armed Forces and for whom a letter from the United States 575 Government or United States Department of Veterans Affairs or 576 its predecessor has been issued certifying that the veteran who 577 died from service-connected causes while on active duty is 578 exempt from taxation. 579 (b)âThe tax exemption carries over to the benefit of the 580 veteranâs surviving spouse as long as the spouse holds the legal 581 or beneficial title to the homestead, permanently resides 582 thereon as specified in s. 196.031, and does not remarry. If the 583 surviving spouse sells the property, the spouse may transfer an 584 exemption not to exceed 120 percent of the amount granted under 585 the most recent ad valorem tax roll to his or her new residence 586 as long as it is used as his or her primary residence and he or 587 she does not remarry. 588 (6)âAny real estate that is owned and used as a homestead 589 by the surviving spouse of a first responder who died in the 590 line of duty while employed by the United States Government, the 591 state, or any political subdivision of the state, including 592 authorities and special districts, and for whom a letter from 593 the United States Government, the state, or appropriate 594 political subdivision of the state, or other authority or 595 special district, has been issued which legally recognizes and 596 certifies that the first responder died in the line of duty 597 while employed as a first responder is exempt from taxation. 598 (b)âThe tax exemption applies as long as the surviving 599 spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the homestead, 600 permanently resides thereon as specified in s. 196.031, and does 601 not remarry. If the surviving spouse sells the property, the 602 spouse may transfer an exemption not to exceed 120 percent of 603 the amount granted under the most recent ad valorem tax roll to 604 his or her new residence if it is used as his or her primary 605 residence and he or she does not remarry. 606 Section 14.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, 607 paragraph (r) of subsection (2) of section 196.173, Florida 608 Statutes, is amended, and paragraphs (s) through (w) are added 609 to that subsection, to read: 610 196.173âExemption for deployed servicemembers.â 611 (2)âThe exemption is available to servicemembers who were 612 deployed during the preceding calendar year on active duty 613 outside the continental United States, Alaska, or Hawaii in 614 support of any of the following military operations: 615 (r)âEuropean Reassurance Initiative/European Deterrence 616 Initiative and Operation European Assure, Deter and Reinforce, 617 which began in 2014. 618 (s)âOperations in Israel and the Gaza Stripâs Mediterranean 619 territorial seas and air spaces, which began in March 2023. 620 (t)âOperations in support of the Pacific Deterrence 621 Initiative, which began in 2021. 622 (u)âOperation Southern Spear, which began in 2025. 623 (v)âOperation Sharp Sentry, which began in 2010. 624 (w)âOperations by the Multinational Force and Observers, 625 which began in 1981. 626 627 The Department of Revenue shall notify all property appraisers 628 and tax collectors in this state of the designated military 629 operations. 630 Section 15.â(1)âThe amendments made by this act to s. 631 196.173, Florida Statutes, first apply to the 2026 property tax 632 roll. 633 (2)âThis section shall take effect upon this act becoming a 634 law. 635 Section 16.âParagraph (o) of subsection (3) of section 636 196.1978, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 637 196.1978âAffordable housing property exemption.â 638 (3)(o)1.âBeginning with the 2025 tax roll, a taxing 639 authority may elect, upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution 640 approved by a two-thirds vote of the governing body, not to 641 exempt property under sub-subparagraph (d)1.a. located in a 642 county specified pursuant to subparagraph 2., subject to the 643 conditions of this paragraph. 644 2.âA taxing authority must make a finding in the ordinance 645 or resolution that annual housing reports the most recently 646 published by the Shimberg Center for Housing Studies Annual 647 Report, prepared pursuant to s. 420.6075 identify, identifies 648 that a county that is part of the jurisdiction of the taxing 649 authority is within a metropolitan statistical area or region 650 where, for each of the previous 3 years, the number of 651 affordable and available units in the metropolitan statistical 652 area or region is greater than the number of renter households 653 in the metropolitan statistical area or region for the category 654 entitled â0-120 percent AMI.â 655 3.âAn election made pursuant to this paragraph may apply 656 only to the ad valorem property tax levies imposed within a 657 county specified pursuant to subparagraph 2. by the taxing 658 authority making the election. 659 4.âThe ordinance or resolution must take effect on the 660 January 1 immediately succeeding adoption and shall expire on 661 the second January 1 after the January 1 in which the ordinance 662 or resolution takes effect. The ordinance or resolution may be 663 renewed prior to its expiration pursuant to this paragraph. 664 5.âThe taxing authority proposing to make an election under 665 this paragraph must advertise the ordinance or resolution or 666 renewal thereof pursuant to the requirements of s. 50.011(1) 667 prior to adoption. 668 6.âThe taxing authority must provide to the property 669 appraiser the adopted ordinance or resolution or renewal thereof 670 by the effective date of the ordinance or resolution or renewal 671 thereof. 672 7.âNotwithstanding an ordinance or resolution or renewal 673 thereof adopted pursuant to this paragraph, property in a 674 multifamily project that received an exemption pursuant to sub 675 subparagraph (d)1.a. before the adoption or renewal of such 676 ordinance or resolution may continue to receive such exemption 677 for each subsequent consecutive year that the same owner or each 678 successive owner applies for and is granted the exemption. 679 8.âNotwithstanding an ordinance or a resolution or a 680 renewal thereof adopted pursuant to this paragraph, the owner of 681 a property in a multifamily project that was issued a building 682 permit on or after July 1, 2026, for the development of 683 residential units in the multifamily project within 4 years 684 before the adoption of such ordinance or resolution or renewal 685 may apply for and be granted the exemption under sub 686 subparagraph (d)1.a. after meeting the requirements of this 687 subsection and may continue to receive such exemption for each 688 subsequent consecutive year in which the same owner or each 689 successive owner applies for and is granted the exemption. 690 Section 17.â(1)âThe amendments made by this act to s. 691 196.1978, Florida Statutes, first apply to the 2027 property tax 692 roll. 693 (2)âAn ordinance adopted pursuant to s. 196.1978(3), 694 Florida Statutes, before the July 1, 2026, is valid until its 695 expiration. 696 Section 18.âParagraph (b) of subsection (5) of section 697 200.065, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 698 200.065âMethod of fixing millage.â 699 (5)âIn each fiscal year: 700 (b)âThe millage rate of a county or municipality, municipal 701 service taxing unit of that county, and any special district 702 dependent to that county or municipality may exceed the maximum 703 millage rate calculated pursuant to this subsection if the total 704 county ad valorem taxes levied or total municipal ad valorem 705 taxes levied do not exceed the maximum total county ad valorem 706 taxes levied or maximum total municipal ad valorem taxes levied 707 respectively. Voted millage and taxes levied by a municipality 708 or independent special district that has levied ad valorem taxes 709 for less than 5 years are not subject to this limitation. The 710 nonvoted millage rate that any other taxing authority that is 711 subject to this limitation may levy in its first year or in a 712 year immediately succeeding a year in which the millage rate was 713 zero must be approved by a vote as provided in subparagraph 714 (a)2. The millage rate of a county authorized to levy a county 715 public hospital surtax under s. 212.055 may exceed the maximum 716 millage rate calculated pursuant to this subsection to the 717 extent necessary to account for the revenues required to be 718 contributed to the county public hospital. Total taxes levied 719 may exceed the maximum calculated pursuant to subsection (6) as 720 a result of an increase in taxable value above that certified in 721 subsection (1) if such increase is less than the percentage 722 amounts contained in subsection (6) or if the administrative 723 adjustment cannot be made because the value adjustment board is 724 still in session at the time the tax roll is extended; 725 otherwise, millage rates subject to this subsection may be 726 reduced so that total taxes levied do not exceed the maximum. 727 728 Any unit of government operating under a home rule charter 729 adopted pursuant to ss. 10, 11, and 24, Art. VIII of the State 730 Constitution of 1885, as preserved by s. 6(e), Art. VIII of the 731 State Constitution, which is granted the authority in the State 732 Constitution to exercise all the powers conferred now or 733 hereafter by general law upon municipalities and which exercises 734 such powers in the unincorporated area shall be recognized as a 735 municipality under this subsection. For a downtown development 736 authority established before the effective date of the State 737 Constitution which has a millage that must be approved by a 738 municipality, the governing body of that municipality shall be 739 considered the governing body of the downtown development 740 authority for purposes of this subsection. 741 Section 19.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 742 202.18, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (b) of that 743 subsection is republished, to read: 744 202.18âAllocation and disposition of tax proceeds.âThe 745 proceeds of the communications services taxes remitted under 746 this chapter shall be treated as follows: 747 (2)âThe proceeds of the taxes remitted under s. 748 202.12(1)(b) shall be allocated as follows: 749 (b)âFifty-five and nine-tenths percent of the remainder 750 shall be allocated to the state and distributed pursuant to s. 751 212.20(6), except that the proceeds allocated pursuant to s. 752 212.20(6)(d)2.b. shall be prorated to the participating counties 753 in the same proportion as that monthâs collection of the taxes 754 and fees imposed pursuant to chapter 212 and paragraph (1)(b). 755 (c)1.âAfter the distribution required under paragraph (b), 756 the remainder During each calendar year, the remaining portion 757 of the proceeds shall be transferred to the Local Government 758 Half-cent Sales Tax Clearing Trust Fund and. Seventy percent of 759 such proceeds shall be allocated in the same proportion as the 760 allocation of total receipts of the half-cent sales tax under s. 761 218.61 and the emergency distribution under s. 218.65 in the 762 prior state fiscal year. Thirty percent of such proceeds shall 763 be distributed pursuant to s. 218.67. 764 2.âThe proportion of the proceeds allocated based on the 765 emergency distribution under s. 218.65 shall be distributed 766 pursuant to s. 218.65. 767 3.âIn each calendar year, the proportion of the proceeds 768 allocated based on the half-cent sales tax under s. 218.61 shall 769 be allocated to each county in the same proportion as the 770 countyâs percentage of total sales tax allocation for the prior 771 state fiscal year and distributed pursuant to s. 218.62. 772 4.âThe department shall distribute the appropriate amount 773 to each municipality and county each month at the same time that 774 local communications services taxes are distributed pursuant to 775 subsection (3). 776 Section 20.âEffective October 1, 2026, present paragraph 777 (j) of subsection (1) of section 203.01, Florida Statutes, is 778 redesignated as paragraph (k) and present subsection (9) of that 779 section is redesignated as subsection (10), a new paragraph (j) 780 is added to subsection (1) and a new subsection (9) is added to 781 that section, and paragraphs (a), (c), and (d) of subsection (1) 782 of that section, are amended to read: 783 203.01âTax on gross receipts for utility and communications 784 services.â 785 (1)(a)1.âA tax is imposed on gross receipts from utility 786 services that are delivered to a retail consumer or to an owner 787 or operator of an electric vehicle charging station as defined 788 in s. 366.94(2) in this state. The tax shall be levied as 789 provided in paragraphs (b)-(k) (b)-(j). Except as provided in 790 paragraph (j), such tax is not imposed on the retail sale of 791 electricity pursuant to s. 212.0516. 792 2.âA tax is levied on communications services as defined in 793 s. 202.11(1). The tax shall be applied to the same services and 794 transactions as are subject to taxation under chapter 202, and 795 to communications services that are subject to the exemption 796 provided in s. 202.125(1). The tax shall be applied to the sales 797 price of communications services when sold at retail, as the 798 terms are defined in s. 202.11, shall be due and payable at the 799 same time as the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 202, and 800 shall be administered and collected pursuant to chapter 202. 801 3.âAn additional tax is levied on charges for, or the use 802 of, electrical power or energy that is subject to the tax levied 803 pursuant to s. 212.05(1)(e)1.c. or s. 212.06(1). The tax shall 804 be applied to the same transactions or uses as are subject to 805 taxation under s. 212.05(1)(e)1.c. or s. 212.06(1). If a 806 transaction or use is exempt from the tax imposed under s. 807 212.05(1)(e)1.c. or s. 212.06(1), the transaction or use is also 808 exempt from the tax imposed under this subparagraph. The tax 809 shall be applied to charges for electrical power or energy and 810 is due and payable at the same time as taxes imposed pursuant to 811 chapter 212. Chapter 212 governs the administration and 812 enforcement of the tax imposed by this subparagraph. The charges 813 upon which the tax imposed by this subparagraph is applied do 814 not include the taxes imposed by subparagraph 1. or s. 166.231. 815 The tax imposed by this subparagraph becomes state funds at the 816 moment of collection and is not considered as revenue of a 817 utility for purposes of a franchise agreement between the 818 utility and a local government. 819 (c)1.âThe tax imposed under subparagraph (a)1. shall be 820 levied against the total amount of gross receipts received by a 821 distribution company for its sale of utility services if the 822 utility service is delivered to the retail consumer or owner or 823 operator of an electrical vehicle charging station by a 824 distribution company and the retail consumer or owner or 825 operator of an electric vehicle charging station pays the 826 distribution company a charge for utility service which includes 827 a charge for both the electricity and the transportation of 828 electricity to the retail consumer or owner or operator of an 829 electrical vehicle charging station. The distribution company 830 shall report and remit to the Department of Revenue by the 20th 831 day of each month the taxes levied pursuant to this paragraph 832 during the preceding month. 833 2.âTo the extent practicable, the Department of Revenue 834 must distribute all receipts of taxes remitted under this 835 chapter to the Public Education Capital Outlay and Debt Service 836 Trust Fund in the same month as the department collects such 837 taxes. 838 (d)1.âEach distribution company that receives payment for 839 the delivery of electricity to a retail consumer or owner or 840 operator of an electrical vehicle charging station in this state 841 is subject to tax on the exercise of this privilege as provided 842 by this paragraph unless the payment is subject to tax under 843 paragraph (c). For the exercise of this privilege, the tax 844 levied on the distribution companyâs receipts for the delivery 845 of electricity shall be determined by multiplying the number of 846 kilowatt hours delivered by the index price and applying the 847 rate in subparagraph (b)1. to the result. 848 2.âThe index price is the Florida price per kilowatt hour 849 for retail consumers in the previous calendar year, as published 850 in the United States Energy Information Administration Electric 851 Power Monthly and announced by the Department of Revenue on June 852 1 of each year to be effective for the 12-month period beginning 853 July 1 of that year. For each residential, commercial, and 854 industrial customer class, the applicable index posted for 855 residential, commercial, and industrial shall be applied in 856 calculating the gross receipts to which the tax applies. If 857 publication of the indices is delayed or discontinued, the last 858 posted index shall be used until a current index is posted or 859 the department adopts a comparable index by rule. 860 3.âTax due under this paragraph shall be administered, 861 paid, and reported in the same manner as the tax due under 862 paragraph (c). 863 4.âThe amount of tax due under this paragraph shall be 864 reduced by the amount of any like tax lawfully imposed on and 865 paid by the person from whom the retail consumer or owner or 866 operator of an electrical vehicle charging station purchased the 867 electricity, whether imposed by and paid to this state, another 868 state, a territory of the United States, or the District of 869 Columbia. This reduction in tax shall be available to the retail 870 consumer or owner or operator of an electrical vehicle charging 871 station as a refund made pursuant to s. 215.26 and does not 872 inure to the benefit of the person who receives payment for the 873 delivery of the electricity. The methods of demonstrating proof 874 of payment and the amount of such refund shall be made according 875 to rules of the Department of Revenue. 876 (j)âAn owner or operator of an electric vehicle charging 877 station that produces electrical energy for the provision of 878 electricity to a consumer at an electric vehicle charging 879 station is directly liable to the state for the tax imposed by 880 subparagraph (a)1. and must register with the department to 881 remit such tax. The amount of tax owed shall be equal to the 882 cost price, as defined in s. 212.02, of such electricity, times 883 the rate set forth in subparagraph (1)(b)1. 884 (9)âPossession by a distribution company of an affidavit 885 from the owner or operator of an electric vehicle charging 886 station, pursuant to s. 212.0516, relieves the distribution 887 company from the responsibility of collecting the tax imposed 888 under subparagraph (1)(a)3. and s. 212.05(1)(e)1.c., and the 889 department shall look solely to the owner or operator of the 890 electric vehicle charging station for recovery of such taxes. 891 Section 21.âEffective October 1, 2026, subsection (1) of 892 section 203.012, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 893 203.012âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter: 894 (1)ââDistribution companyâ means any person owning or 895 operating local electric or natural or manufactured gas utility 896 distribution facilities within this state for the transmission, 897 delivery, and sale of electricity or natural or manufactured 898 gas. The term does not include natural gas transmission 899 companies that are subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal 900 Energy Regulatory Commission. The term does not include a person 901 who owns or operates an electric vehicle charging station that 902 purchases electricity for resale under s. 212.0516 and who does 903 not produce electrical energy for the provision of electricity 904 to a consumer at an electric vehicle charging station. 905 Section 22.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 906 212.04, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 907 212.04âAdmissions tax; rate, procedure, enforcement.â 908 (2)(a)âA tax may not be levied on: 909 1.âAdmissions to athletic or other events sponsored by 910 elementary schools, junior high schools, middle schools, high 911 schools, community colleges, public or private colleges and 912 universities, deaf and blind schools, facilities of the youth 913 services programs of the Department of Children and Families, 914 and state correctional institutions if only student, faculty, or 915 inmate talent is used. However, this exemption does not apply to 916 admission to athletic events sponsored by a state university, 917 and the proceeds of the tax collected on such admissions shall 918 be retained and used by each institution to support womenâs 919 athletics as provided in s. 1006.71(2)(c). 920 2.âDues, membership fees, and admission charges imposed by 921 not-for-profit sponsoring organizations. To receive this 922 exemption, the sponsoring organization must qualify as a not 923 for-profit entity under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 924 Code of 1954, as amended. 925 3.âAdmission charges to an event sponsored by a 926 governmental entity, sports authority, or sports commission if 927 held in a convention hall, exhibition hall, auditorium, stadium, 928 theater, arena, civic center, performing arts center, or 929 publicly owned recreational facility and if 100 percent of the 930 risk of success or failure lies with the sponsor of the event 931 and 100 percent of the funds at risk for the event belong to the 932 sponsor, and student or faculty talent is not exclusively used. 933 As used in this subparagraph, the terms âsports authorityâ and 934 âsports commissionâ mean a nonprofit organization that is exempt 935 from federal income tax under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal 936 Revenue Code and that contracts with a county or municipal 937 government for the purpose of promoting and attracting sports 938 tourism events to the community with which it contracts. 939 4.âAn admission paid by a student, or on the studentâs 940 behalf, to any required place of sport or recreation if the 941 studentâs participation in the sport or recreational activity is 942 required as a part of a program or activity sponsored by, and 943 under the jurisdiction of, the studentâs educational institution 944 if his or her attendance is as a participant and not as a 945 spectator. 946 5.âAdmissions to the National Football League championship 947 game or Pro Bowl; admissions to any semifinal game or 948 championship game of a national collegiate tournament; 949 admissions to a Major League Baseball, Major League Soccer, 950 National Basketball Association, or National Hockey League all 951 star game; admissions to the Major League Baseball Home Run 952 Derby held before the Major League Baseball All-Star Game; 953 admissions to any FIFA World Cup match sanctioned by the 954 FÃ©dÃ©ration Internationale de Football Association (FIFA), 955 including any qualifying match held up to 12 months before the 956 FIFA World Cup matches; admissions to any Formula One Grand Prix 957 race sanctioned by the FÃ©dÃ©ration Internationale de 958 lâAutomobile, including any qualifying or support races held at 959 the circuit up to 72 hours before the grand prix race; 960 admissions to the Daytona 500 sanctioned by the National 961 Association for Stock Car Auto Racing (NASCAR), including any 962 qualifying or support races held at the same track up to 72 963 hours before the race; admissions to the NASCAR Cup Series 964 Championship Race, sanctioned by NASCAR, when held at the 965 Homestead-Miami Speedway, including any qualifying or support 966 races held at the same track up to 72 hours before the race; or 967 admissions to National Basketball Association all-star events 968 produced by the National Basketball Association and held at a 969 facility such as an arena, convention center, or municipal 970 facility. 971 6.âA participation fee or sponsorship fee imposed by a 972 governmental entity as described in s. 212.08(6) for an athletic 973 or recreational program if the governmental entity by itself, or 974 in conjunction with an organization exempt under s. 501(c)(3) of 975 the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, sponsors, 976 administers, plans, supervises, directs, and controls the 977 athletic or recreational program. 978 7.âAdmissions to live theater, live opera, or live ballet 979 productions in this state which are sponsored by an organization 980 that has received a determination from the Internal Revenue 981 Service that the organization is exempt from federal income tax 982 under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as 983 amended, if the organization actively participates in planning 984 and conducting the event; is responsible for the safety and 985 success of the event; is organized for the purpose of sponsoring 986 live theater, live opera, or live ballet productions in this 987 state; has more than 10,000 subscribing members and has among 988 the stated purposes in its charter the promotion of arts 989 education in the communities it serves; and will receive at 990 least 20 percent of the net profits, if any, of the events the 991 organization sponsors and will bear the risk of at least 20 992 percent of the losses, if any, from the events it sponsors if 993 the organization employs other persons as agents to provide 994 services in connection with a sponsored event. Before March 1 of 995 each year, such organization may apply to the department for a 996 certificate of exemption for admissions to such events sponsored 997 in this state by the organization during the immediately 998 following state fiscal year. The application must state the 999 total dollar amount of admissions receipts collected by the 1000 organization or its agents from such events in this state 1001 sponsored by the organization or its agents in the year 1002 immediately preceding the year in which the organization applies 1003 for the exemption. Such organization shall receive the exemption 1004 only to the extent of $1.5 million multiplied by the ratio that 1005 such receipts bear to the total of such receipts of all 1006 organizations applying for the exemption in such year; however, 1007 such exemption granted to any organization may not exceed 6 1008 percent of such admissions receipts collected by the 1009 organization or its agents in the year immediately preceding the 1010 year in which the organization applies for the exemption. Each 1011 organization receiving the exemption shall report each month to 1012 the department the total admissions receipts collected from such 1013 events sponsored by the organization during the preceding month 1014 and shall remit to the department an amount equal to 6 percent 1015 of such receipts reduced by any amount remaining under the 1016 exemption. Tickets for such events sold by such organizations 1017 may not reflect the tax otherwise imposed under this section. 1018 8.âEntry fees for participation in freshwater fishing 1019 tournaments. 1020 9.âParticipation or entry fees charged to participants in a 1021 game, race, or other sport or recreational event if spectators 1022 are charged a taxable admission to such event. 1023 10.âAdmissions to any postseason collegiate football game 1024 sanctioned by the National Collegiate Athletic Association. 1025 11.âAdmissions to and membership fees for gun clubs. For 1026 purposes of this subparagraph, the term âgun clubâ means an 1027 organization whose primary purpose is to offer its members 1028 access to one or more shooting ranges for target or skeet 1029 shooting. 1030 12.âFees for admission to state parks, including annual 1031 entrance passes. 1032 13.âAdmissions to any Association of Tennis Professionalsâ 1033 ATP Masters 1000 tournament or any Womenâs Tennis Associationâs 1034 WTA 1000 tournament. This subparagraph expires July 1, 2029. 1035 Section 23.âEffective October 1, 2026, paragraph (e) of 1036 subsection (1) of section 212.05, Florida Statutes, is amended 1037 to read: 1038 212.05âSales, storage, use tax.âIt is hereby declared to be 1039 the legislative intent that every person is exercising a taxable 1040 privilege who engages in the business of selling tangible 1041 personal property at retail in this state, including the 1042 business of making or facilitating remote sales; who rents or 1043 furnishes any of the things or services taxable under this 1044 chapter; or who stores for use or consumption in this state any 1045 item or article of tangible personal property as defined herein 1046 and who leases or rents such property within the state. 1047 (1)âFor the exercise of such privilege, a tax is levied on 1048 each taxable transaction or incident, which tax is due and 1049 payable as follows: 1050 (e)1.âAt the rate of 6 percent on charges for: 1051 a.âPrepaid calling arrangements. The tax on charges for 1052 prepaid calling arrangements shall be collected at the time of 1053 sale and remitted by the selling dealer. 1054 (I)ââPrepaid calling arrangementâ has the same meaning as 1055 provided in s. 202.11. 1056 (II)âIf the sale or recharge of the prepaid calling 1057 arrangement does not take place at the dealerâs place of 1058 business, it shall be deemed to have taken place at the 1059 customerâs shipping address or, if no item is shipped, at the 1060 customerâs address or the location associated with the 1061 customerâs mobile telephone number. 1062 (III)âThe sale or recharge of a prepaid calling arrangement 1063 shall be treated as a sale of tangible personal property for 1064 purposes of this chapter, regardless of whether a tangible item 1065 evidencing such arrangement is furnished to the purchaser, and 1066 such sale within this state subjects the selling dealer to the 1067 jurisdiction of this state for purposes of this subsection. 1068 (IV)âNo additional tax under this chapter or chapter 202 is 1069 due or payable if a purchaser of a prepaid calling arrangement 1070 who has paid tax under this chapter on the sale or recharge of 1071 such arrangement applies one or more units of the prepaid 1072 calling arrangement to obtain communications services as 1073 described in s. 202.11(9)(b)3., other services that are not 1074 communications services, or products. 1075 b.âThe installation of telecommunication and telegraphic 1076 equipment. 1077 c.âElectrical power or energy, including the provision of 1078 electric vehicle charging pursuant to s. 212.0516, except that 1079 the tax rate for such charges for electrical power or energy is 1080 4.35 percent. Charges for electrical power and energy, including 1081 the provision of electric vehicle charging, do not include taxes 1082 imposed under ss. 166.231 and 203.01(1)(a)3. 1083 2.âSection 212.17(3), regarding credit for tax paid on 1084 charges subsequently found to be worthless, is equally 1085 applicable to any tax paid under this section on charges for 1086 prepaid calling arrangements, telecommunication or telegraph 1087 services, or electric power subsequently found to be 1088 uncollectible. As used in this paragraph, the term âchargesâ 1089 does not include any excise or similar tax levied by the Federal 1090 Government, a political subdivision of this state, or a 1091 municipality upon the purchase, sale, or recharge of prepaid 1092 calling arrangements or upon the purchase or sale of 1093 telecommunication, television system program, or telegraph 1094 service or electric power, which tax is collected by the seller 1095 from the purchaser. 1096 Section 24.âEffective October 1, 2026, section 212.0516, 1097 Florida Statutes, is created to read: 1098 212.0516âTaxation of electricity at an electric vehicle 1099 charging station.â 1100 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âelectric vehicle 1101 charging stationâ has the same meaning as in s. 366.94(2). 1102 (2)âNotwithstanding any law to the contrary, and for 1103 purposes of this chapter, the provision of electricity to a 1104 consumer at an electric vehicle charging station shall be 1105 considered the retail sale of electricity and is subject to the 1106 tax levied under ss. 203.01(1)(a)3. and 212.05(1)(e)1.c. 1107 Purchases of electricity for the provision of electricity to a 1108 consumer at an electric vehicle charging station may be made for 1109 resale and includes up to 105 percent of the amount of 1110 electricity that goes into the storage batteries of an electric 1111 vehicle. 1112 (3)âThe tax levied on charges for electrical power or 1113 energy under ss. 203.01(1)(a)3. and 212.05(1)(e)1.c. are in 1114 addition to any other tax or fee levied on the sale of 1115 electricity and shall be remitted as prescribed by law by the 1116 electric vehicle charging station. 1117 (4)âThe owner or operator of an electric vehicle charging 1118 station shall keep records of the quantity of electricity 1119 purchased, created, or generated, if applicable, and the 1120 quantity of electricity that went into the storage batteries of 1121 an electric vehicle in the same manner as other pertinent 1122 records and papers required to be held under s. 213.35. 1123 (5)âThe owner or operator of the electric vehicle charging 1124 station shall furnish a seller of electricity with an affidavit, 1125 on a form prescribed by the department, attesting to the 1126 quantity of electricity purchased for resale, pursuant to this 1127 section, and other information as required by the department. 1128 Any person that furnishes a false affidavit to a seller for the 1129 purpose of evading payment of any tax imposed under this chapter 1130 shall be subject to the penalties set forth in s. 212.085 and as 1131 otherwise provided by law. Possession by a seller of an 1132 affidavit furnished pursuant to this subsection relieves the 1133 seller of the responsibility of collecting the tax on the sale 1134 of the electricity for which a resale is made, and the 1135 department shall look solely to the owner or operator for 1136 recovery of the tax if it determines that the owner or operator 1137 purchased electricity that was not resold. 1138 (6)âThis section applies only to persons engaged in the 1139 business of providing electric vehicle charging to consumers and 1140 does not include any individual, business, or governmental 1141 entity that provides electric vehicle charging for their own 1142 vehicles. 1143 (7)âThis section may not be construed to affect the 1144 regulation of electric vehicle charging or electric vehicle 1145 chargers for any purpose other than for the administration of 1146 the legal incidence of taxation. 1147 (8)âThe department may adopt rules necessary to administer 1148 the provisions of this section, including requiring such 1149 information as it may deem necessary to ensure that the taxes 1150 levied under ss. 203.01(1)(a)1. and 3. and 212.05(1)(e)1.c. are 1151 properly collected and remitted. 1152 Section 25.âSubsection (6) of section 212.08, Florida 1153 Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (ffff) is added to 1154 subsection (7) of that section, to read: 1155 212.08âSales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and 1156 storage tax; specified exemptions.âThe sale at retail, the 1157 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the 1158 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following 1159 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this 1160 chapter. 1161 (6)âEXEMPTIONS; POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS.â 1162 (a)1.âThere are also exempt from the tax imposed by this 1163 chapter sales made to the United States Government, a state, or 1164 any county, municipality, or political subdivision of a state 1165 when payment is made directly to the dealer by the governmental 1166 entity. This exemption shall not inure to any transaction 1167 otherwise taxable under this chapter when payment is made by a 1168 government employee by any means, including, but not limited to, 1169 cash, check, or credit card when that employee is subsequently 1170 reimbursed by the governmental entity. This exemption does not 1171 include sales, rental, use, consumption, or storage for use in 1172 any political subdivision or municipality in this state of 1173 machines and equipment and parts and accessories therefor used 1174 in the generation, transmission, or distribution of electrical 1175 energy by systems owned and operated by a political subdivision 1176 in this state for transmission or distribution expansion. 1177 Likewise exempt are charges for services rendered by radio and 1178 television stations, including line charges, talent fees, or 1179 license fees and charges for films, videotapes, and 1180 transcriptions used in producing radio or television broadcasts. 1181 The exemption provided in this paragraph subsection does not 1182 include sales, rental, use, consumption, or storage for use in 1183 any political subdivision or municipality in this state of 1184 machines and equipment and parts and accessories therefor used 1185 in providing two-way telecommunications services to the public 1186 for hire by the use of a telecommunications facility, as defined 1187 in s. 364.02(14), and for which a certificate is required under 1188 chapter 364, which facility is owned and operated by any county, 1189 municipality, or other political subdivision of the state. Any 1190 immunity of any political subdivision of the state or other 1191 entity of local government from taxation of the property used to 1192 provide telecommunication services that is taxed as a result of 1193 this section is hereby waived. However, the exemption provided 1194 in this paragraph subsection includes transactions taxable under 1195 this chapter which are for use by the operator of a public-use 1196 airport, as defined in s. 332.004, in providing such 1197 telecommunications services for the airport or its tenants, 1198 concessionaires, or licensees, or which are for use by a public 1199 hospital for the provision of such telecommunications services. 1200 2.(b)âThe exemption provided under this paragraph 1201 subsection does not include sales of tangible personal property 1202 made to contractors employed directly to or as agents of any 1203 such government or political subdivision when such tangible 1204 personal property goes into or becomes a part of public works 1205 owned by such government or political subdivision. A 1206 determination of whether a particular transaction is properly 1207 characterized as an exempt sale to a government entity or a 1208 taxable sale to a contractor shall be based upon the substance 1209 of the transaction rather than the form in which the transaction 1210 is cast. However, for sales of tangible personal property that 1211 go into or become a part of public works owned by a governmental 1212 entity, other than the Federal Government, a governmental entity 1213 claiming the exemption provided under this paragraph subsection 1214 shall certify to the dealer and the contractor the entityâs 1215 claim to the exemption by providing the dealer and the 1216 contractor a certificate of entitlement to the exemption for 1217 such sales. If the department later determines that such sales, 1218 in which the governmental entity provided the dealer and the 1219 contractor with a certificate of entitlement to the exemption, 1220 were not exempt sales to the governmental entity, the 1221 governmental entity shall be liable for any tax, penalty, and 1222 interest determined to be owed on such transactions. Possession 1223 by a dealer or contractor of a certificate of entitlement to the 1224 exemption from the governmental entity relieves the dealer from 1225 the responsibility of collecting tax on the sale and the 1226 contractor for any liability for tax, penalty, or interest 1227 related to the sale, and the department shall look solely to the 1228 governmental entity for recovery of tax, penalty, and interest 1229 if the department determines that the transaction was not an 1230 exempt sale to the governmental entity. The governmental entity 1231 may not transfer liability for such tax, penalty, and interest 1232 to another party by contract or agreement. 1233 3.(c)âThe department shall adopt rules for determining 1234 whether a particular transaction is properly characterized as an 1235 exempt sale to a governmental entity or a taxable sale to a 1236 contractor which give special consideration to factors that 1237 govern the status of the tangible personal property before being 1238 affixed to real property. In developing such rules, assumption 1239 of the risk of damage or loss is of paramount consideration in 1240 the determination. The department shall also adopt, by rule, a 1241 certificate of entitlement to exemption for use as provided in 1242 subparagraph 2. paragraph (b). The certificate shall require the 1243 governmental entity to affirm that it will comply with the 1244 requirements of this paragraph subsection and the rules adopted 1245 under subparagraph 2. paragraph (b) in order to qualify for the 1246 exemption and that it acknowledges its liability for any tax, 1247 penalty, or interest later determined by the department to be 1248 owed on such transactions. 1249 4.(d)âFor purposes of subparagraph 1. paragraph (a), the 1250 phrase âwhen payment is made directly to the dealer by the 1251 governmental entityâ includes situations in which an entity 1252 under contract with a municipality to maintain and operate a 1253 municipally owned golf course pays for a purchase or lease for 1254 the operation or maintenance of that golf course using the golf 1255 course revenues or other funds provided by the municipality for 1256 use by that entity. This subparagraph paragraph applies to a 1257 municipally owned golf course that is: 1258 a.1.âLocated in a county with a population of at least 2 1259 million residents. 1260 b.2.âThe site upon which youth education programs are 1261 delivered on an ongoing basis by a nonprofit organization that 1262 is exempt from federal income tax under s. 501(c)(3) of the 1263 Internal Revenue Code. 1264 (b)1.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, 1265 sales of tangible personal property made to contractors employed 1266 directly to or as agents of a state university as identified in 1267 s. 1000.21(9) are exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter 1268 when such tangible personal property goes into or becomes part 1269 of public works owned by such state university. This exemption 1270 inures to the state university at the time the tangible personal 1271 property goes into or becomes part of the public works, but only 1272 through a refund of previously paid taxes. Such refund must be 1273 made within 30 days after formal approval by the department of 1274 the taxpayerâs application. 1275 2.âTo receive a refund pursuant to this paragraph, a state 1276 university must file an application with the department on a 1277 quarterly basis. The application must include: 1278 a.âThe name and address of the state university claiming 1279 the refund. 1280 b.âThe identity of the state university public works 1281 project or projects. 1282 c.âThe name and address of each contractor that 1283 manufactured or purchased tangible personal property for 1284 installation in the public works project or projects for which a 1285 refund of tax paid is being requested. 1286 d.âA copy of the state universityâs exemption certificate. 1287 e.âThe total amount of the requested refund of tax paid, 1288 including copies of each invoice evidencing the purchase of 1289 tangible personal property that was installed or became a part 1290 of the public works project or projects and the payment of tax 1291 on such tangible personal property. 1292 3.âThe department shall adopt rules governing the manner 1293 and form of refund applications and may establish guidelines as 1294 to the requisites for an affirmative showing of qualification 1295 for exemption and refund of tax under this paragraph. The state 1296 university must file the refund application under oath affirming 1297 that it will comply with the requirements of this paragraph and 1298 the rules adopted in this subparagraph in order to qualify for 1299 the exemption and that it acknowledges its liability for any 1300 tax, penalty, or interest for tax refunded to the university 1301 which was later determined by the department to be owed on such 1302 transactions. 1303 (7)âMISCELLANEOUS EXEMPTIONS.âExemptions provided to any 1304 entity by this chapter do not inure to any transaction that is 1305 otherwise taxable under this chapter when payment is made by a 1306 representative or employee of the entity by any means, 1307 including, but not limited to, cash, check, or credit card, even 1308 when that representative or employee is subsequently reimbursed 1309 by the entity. In addition, exemptions provided to any entity by 1310 this subsection do not inure to any transaction that is 1311 otherwise taxable under this chapter unless the entity has 1312 obtained a sales tax exemption certificate from the department 1313 or the entity obtains or provides other documentation as 1314 required by the department. Eligible purchases or leases made 1315 with such a certificate must be in strict compliance with this 1316 subsection and departmental rules, and any person who makes an 1317 exempt purchase with a certificate that is not in strict 1318 compliance with this subsection and the rules is liable for and 1319 shall pay the tax. The department may adopt rules to administer 1320 this subsection. 1321 (ffff)âLiquified petroleum gas tanks.âPortable tanks for 1322 butane gas, propane gas, natural gas, or any other form of 1323 liquefied petroleum gas with a capacity of 20 pounds or less are 1324 exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter. 1325 Section 26.âParagraph (d) of subsection (6) of section 1326 212.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1327 212.20âFunds collected, disposition; additional powers of 1328 department; operational expense; refund of taxes adjudicated 1329 unconstitutionally collected.â 1330 (6)âDistribution of all proceeds under this chapter and ss. 1331 202.18(1)(b) and (2)(b) and 203.01(1)(a)3. is as follows: 1332 (d)âThe proceeds of all other taxes and fees imposed 1333 pursuant to this chapter or remitted pursuant to s. 202.18(1)(b) 1334 and (2)(b) shall be distributed as follows: 1335 1.âIn any fiscal year, the greater of $500 million, minus 1336 an amount equal to 4.6 percent of the proceeds of the taxes 1337 collected pursuant to chapter 201, or 5.2 percent of all other 1338 taxes and fees imposed pursuant to this chapter or remitted 1339 pursuant to s. 202.18(1)(b) and (2)(b) shall be deposited in 1340 monthly installments into the General Revenue Fund. 1341 2.âAfter the distribution under subparagraph 1., 8.9744 1342 percent of the amount remitted by a sales tax dealer located 1343 within a participating county pursuant to s. 218.61 shall be 1344 transferred in two parts: 1345 a.âThe total amount of $50 million of the communications 1346 services taxes remitted pursuant to s. 202.18(1)(b) and (2)(b), 1347 in any fiscal year, shall be distributed by the department by a 1348 nonoperating transfer to the Department of Commerce in monthly 1349 installments to the Grants and Donations Trust Fund within the 1350 Department of Commerce for the Utility Relocation Reimbursement 1351 Grant Program created in s. 337.4031; and 1352 b.âThe remainder shall be transferred into the Local 1353 Government Half-cent Sales Tax Clearing Trust Fund. Beginning 1354 October 1, 2025, the amount to be transferred shall be reduced 1355 by 0.1018 percent, and the department shall distribute this 1356 amount to the Public Employees Relations Commission Trust Fund 1357 less $5,000 each month, which shall be added to the amount 1358 calculated in subparagraph 3. and distributed accordingly. 1359 3.âAfter the distribution under subparagraphs 1. and 2., 1360 0.0966 percent shall be transferred to the Local Government 1361 Half-cent Sales Tax Clearing Trust Fund and distributed pursuant 1362 to s. 218.65. 1363 4.âAfter the distributions under subparagraphs 1., 2., and 1364 3., 2.0810 percent of the available proceeds shall be 1365 transferred monthly to the Revenue Sharing Trust Fund for 1366 Counties pursuant to s. 218.215. 1367 5.âAfter the distributions under subparagraphs 1., 2., and 1368 3., 1.3653 percent of the available proceeds shall be 1369 transferred monthly to the Revenue Sharing Trust Fund for 1370 Municipalities pursuant to s. 218.215. If the total revenue to 1371 be distributed pursuant to this subparagraph is at least as 1372 great as the amount due from the Revenue Sharing Trust Fund for 1373 Municipalities and the former Municipal Financial Assistance 1374 Trust Fund in state fiscal year 1999-2000, no municipality shall 1375 receive less than the amount due from the Revenue Sharing Trust 1376 Fund for Municipalities and the former Municipal Financial 1377 Assistance Trust Fund in state fiscal year 1999-2000. If the 1378 total proceeds to be distributed are less than the amount 1379 received in combination from the Revenue Sharing Trust Fund for 1380 Municipalities and the former Municipal Financial Assistance 1381 Trust Fund in state fiscal year 1999-2000, each municipality 1382 shall receive an amount proportionate to the amount it was due 1383 in state fiscal year 1999-2000. 1384 6.âAfter the distributions required under subparagraphs 1. 1385 5., the greater of $50 million or 0.1412 percent of the 1386 available proceeds shall be transferred in each fiscal year to 1387 fiscally constrained counties pursuant to s. 218.67. 1388 7.âOf the remaining proceeds: 1389 a.âIn each fiscal year, the sum of $29,915,500 shall be 1390 divided into as many equal parts as there are counties in this 1391 the state, and one part shall be distributed to each county. The 1392 distribution among the several counties must begin each fiscal 1393 year on or before January 5th and continue monthly for a total 1394 of 4 months. If a local or special law required that any moneys 1395 accruing to a county in fiscal year 1999-2000 under the then 1396 existing provisions of s. 550.135 be paid directly to the 1397 district school board, special district, or a municipal 1398 government, such payment must continue until the local or 1399 special law is amended or repealed. The state covenants with 1400 holders of bonds or other instruments of indebtedness issued by 1401 local governments, special districts, or district school boards 1402 before July 1, 2000, that it is not the intent of this 1403 subparagraph to adversely affect the rights of those holders or 1404 relieve local governments, special districts, or district school 1405 boards of the duty to meet their obligations as a result of 1406 previous pledges or assignments or trusts entered into which 1407 obligated funds received from the distribution to county 1408 governments under then-existing s. 550.135. This distribution 1409 specifically is in lieu of funds distributed under s. 550.135 1410 before July 1, 2000. 1411 b.âThe department shall distribute $166,667 monthly to each 1412 applicant certified as a facility for a new or retained 1413 professional sports franchise pursuant to s. 288.1162. Up to 1414 $41,667 shall be distributed monthly by the department to each 1415 certified applicant as defined in s. 288.11621 for a facility 1416 for a spring training franchise. However, not more than $416,670 1417 may be distributed monthly in the aggregate to all certified 1418 applicants for facilities for spring training franchises. 1419 Distributions begin 60 days after such certification and 1420 continue for not more than 30 years, except as otherwise 1421 provided in s. 288.11621. A certified applicant identified in 1422 this sub-subparagraph may not receive more in distributions than 1423 expended by the applicant for the public purposes provided in s. 1424 288.1162(5) or s. 288.11621(3). 1425 c.âThe department shall distribute up to $83,333 monthly to 1426 each certified applicant as defined in s. 288.11631 for a 1427 facility used by a single spring training franchise, or up to 1428 $166,667 monthly to each certified applicant as defined in s. 1429 288.11631 for a facility used by more than one spring training 1430 franchise. Monthly distributions begin 60 days after such 1431 certification or July 1, 2016, whichever is later, and continue 1432 for not more than 20 years to each certified applicant as 1433 defined in s. 288.11631 for a facility used by a single spring 1434 training franchise or not more than 25 years to each certified 1435 applicant as defined in s. 288.11631 for a facility used by more 1436 than one spring training franchise. A certified applicant 1437 identified in this sub-subparagraph may not receive more in 1438 distributions than expended by the applicant for the public 1439 purposes provided in s. 288.11631(3). 1440 d.âThe department shall distribute $15,333 monthly to the 1441 State Transportation Trust Fund. 1442 e.âBeginning July 1, 2023, in each fiscal year, the 1443 department shall distribute $27.5 million to the Florida 1444 Agricultural Promotional Campaign Trust Fund under s. 571.26, 1445 for further distribution in accordance with s. 571.265. 1446 8.7.âAll other proceeds must remain in the General Revenue 1447 Fund. 1448 Section 27.âSection 218.67, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1449 read: 1450 218.67âDistribution for fiscally constrained counties.â 1451 (1)âEach county that is entirely within a rural area of 1452 opportunity as designated by the Governor pursuant to s. 1453 288.0656 or each county for which the value of a mill will raise 1454 no more than $10 $5 million in revenue, based on the taxable 1455 value certified pursuant to s. 1011.62(4)(a)1.a., from the 1456 previous July 1, is shall be considered a fiscally constrained 1457 county. 1458 (2)âEach fiscally constrained county government that 1459 participates in the local government half-cent sales tax shall 1460 be eligible to receive an additional distribution from the Local 1461 Government Half-cent Sales Tax Clearing Trust Fund, as provided 1462 in s. 212.20(6)(d)6. s. 202.18(2)(c)1., in addition to its 1463 regular monthly distribution provided under this part and any 1464 emergency or supplemental distribution under s. 218.65. 1465 (3)âThe amount to be distributed to each fiscally 1466 constrained county shall be determined by the Department of 1467 Revenue at the beginning of the fiscal year, using the prior 1468 fiscal yearâs sales and use tax collections from the most recent 1469 fiscal year that reports 12 months of collections July 1 taxable 1470 value certified pursuant to s. 1011.62(4)(a)1.a., tax data, the 1471 population as defined in s. 218.21, and the most current 1472 calendar year per capita personal income, as initially reported 1473 by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the United States 1474 Department of Commerce millage rate levied for the prior fiscal 1475 year. The amount distributed shall be allocated based upon the 1476 following factors: 1477 (a)âThe contribution-to-revenue relative revenue-raising 1478 capacity factor for each participating county must equal 100 1479 multiplied by a quotient, the numerator of which is the countyâs 1480 population and the denominator of which is the state sales and 1481 use tax collections attributable to the county shall be the 1482 ability of the eligible county to generate ad valorem revenues 1483 from 1 mill of taxation on a per capita basis. A county that 1484 raises no more than $25 per capita from 1 mill shall be assigned 1485 a value of 1; a county that raises more than $25 but no more 1486 than $30 per capita from 1 mill shall be assigned a value of 1487 0.75; and a county that raises more than $30 but no more than 1488 $50 per capita from 1 mill shall be assigned a value of 0.5. No 1489 value shall be assigned to counties that raise more than $50 per 1490 capita from 1 mill of ad valorem taxation. 1491 (b)âThe personal-income local-effort factor must equal a 1492 quotient, the numerator of which is the median per capita 1493 personal income of participating counties and the denominator of 1494 which is the countyâs per capita personal income shall be a 1495 measure of the relative level of local effort of the eligible 1496 county as indicated by the millage rate levied for the prior 1497 fiscal year. The local-effort factor shall be the most recently 1498 adopted countywide operating millage rate for each eligible 1499 county multiplied by 0.1. 1500 (c)âEach eligible countyâs proportional allocation of the 1501 total amount available to be distributed to all of the eligible 1502 counties must shall be in the same proportion as the sum of the 1503 countyâs two factors is to the sum of the two factors for all 1504 eligible counties. The proportional rate computation must be 1505 carried to the fifth decimal place, and the amount to distribute 1506 to each county must be rounded to the nearest whole dollar 1507 amount. The counties that are eligible to receive an allocation 1508 under this subsection and the amount available to be distributed 1509 to such counties do shall not include counties participating in 1510 the phaseout period under subsection (4) or the amounts they 1511 remain eligible to receive during the phaseout. 1512 (4)âFor those counties that no longer qualify under the 1513 requirements of subsection (1) after the effective date of this 1514 act, there shall be a 2-year phaseout period. Beginning on July 1515 1 of the year following the year in which the value of a mill 1516 for that county exceeds $10 $5 million in revenue, the county 1517 shall receive two-thirds of the amount received in the prior 1518 year, and beginning on July 1 of the second year following the 1519 year in which the value of a mill for that county exceeds $10 $5 1520 million in revenue, the county shall receive one-third of the 1521 amount received in the last year that the county qualified as a 1522 fiscally constrained county. Following the 2-year phaseout 1523 period, the county is shall no longer be eligible to receive any 1524 distributions under this section unless the county can be 1525 considered a fiscally constrained county as provided in 1526 subsection (1). 1527 (5)(a)âThe revenues received under this section must be 1528 allocated may be used by a county to be used for the following 1529 purposes: 1530 1.âFifty percent for public safety, including salary 1531 expenditures for law enforcement officers or correctional 1532 officers, as those terms are defined in s. 943.10(1) and (2), 1533 respectively, firefighters as defined in s. 633.102, and 1534 emergency medical technicians or paramedics as those terms are 1535 defined in s. 401.23. 1536 2.âThirty percent for infrastructure needs. 1537 3.âTwenty percent for any public purpose. 1538 (b)âThe revenues received under this section any public 1539 purpose, except that such revenues may not be used to pay debt 1540 service on bonds, notes, certificates of participation, or any 1541 other forms of indebtedness. 1542 Section 28.âParagraph (e) of subsection (4) and subsection 1543 (5) of section 288.062, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1544 288.062âRural Community Investment Program.â 1545 (4) 1546 (e)âA tax credit certified under this paragraph may not be 1547 taken against state tax liability until a rural fund receives a 1548 final order under subsection (5). After approving the 1549 application, the department must provide a certification to the 1550 applicant which does all of the following: 1551 1.âDesignates the applicant as a rural fund. 1552 2.âCertifies the amount of the rural fundâs investment 1553 authority. 1554 3.âCertifies the amount of tax credits available to persons 1555 who make investor contributions in the rural fund. The certified 1556 tax credits must be equal to 50 25 percent of the rural fundâs 1557 investment authority under subparagraph 2. 1558 4.âA statement that tax credits may not be taken against 1559 state tax liability until the rural fund receives a final order 1560 under subsection (5). 1561 (5)âUpon receipt of the notification under paragraph 1562 (4)(g), the department must issue a final order approving the 1563 taxpayer to receive tax credits under this section. The final 1564 order must include the identity, including name and tax 1565 identification number, of each taxpayer who is eligible to claim 1566 the credit and the amount of credits that may be claimed by each 1567 taxpayer. The amount of tax credits that the taxpayer is 1568 approved to receive must be equal to 50 25 percent of the 1569 investor contribution specified in the notification under 1570 subparagraph (4)(g)3. The department must provide the final 1571 order to the rural fund and the Department of Revenue. 1572 Section 29.âSection 377.817, Florida Statutes, is created 1573 to read: 1574 377.817âProhibiting the adoption or implementation of net 1575 zero policies by governmental entities.â 1576 (1)âThe Legislature finds that net zero policies, carbon 1577 taxes and assessments, and emission trading programs are 1578 detrimental to this stateâs energy security and economic 1579 interests and inconsistent with the energy policy and the 1580 environmental policy of the state. 1581 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 1582 (a)ââEmission trading program,â also known as a âcap-and 1583 taxâ or âcap-and-tradeâ program, means any program that 1584 establishes a greenhouse gas emission limit for a particular 1585 activity and provides for the allocation, auction, sale, or 1586 transfer of emissions allowances or credits among pollutant 1587 sources as a means of compliance with such limits. 1588 (b)ââGovernmental entityâ has the same meaning as in s. 1589 215.985(1). 1590 (c)ââGreenhouse gasâ means any of the following gases, or a 1591 combination thereof: 1592 1.âCarbon dioxide. 1593 2.âMethane. 1594 3.âNitrous oxide. 1595 4.âHydrofluorocarbons. 1596 5.âPerfluorocarbons. 1597 6.âSulphur hexafluoride. 1598 7.âNitrogen trifluoride. 1599 (d)ââNet zero policyâ means any policy, program, or 1600 initiative designed to achieve a balance between the total 1601 amount of greenhouse gas emitted into the atmosphere with an 1602 equal amount removed from the atmosphere. 1603 (e)ââPublic fundsâ means all moneys under the jurisdiction 1604 or control of a governmental entity. 1605 (3)âA governmental entity may not enact or enforce, or 1606 require any person or legal entity to enact or enforce, a 1607 resolution, an ordinance, a rule, a code, or a policy to support 1608 a net zero policy, including as a condition of any contract or 1609 agreement between the governmental entity and a third party. 1610 (4)âA governmental entity may not use, pay, or distribute 1611 public funds in any manner that supports, implements, or 1612 advances a net zero policy by doing any of the following: 1613 (a)âProviding procurement or purchasing preferences for a 1614 product or vendor on the basis that the procurement or purchase 1615 of such product or from such vendor will advance or support a 1616 net zero policy. 1617 (b)âProviding procurement or purchasing preferences for any 1618 goods, including, but not limited to, vehicles, equipment, 1619 appliances, or other products, based solely on the types or 1620 sources of fuel used by, or used in the production of, such 1621 goods. 1622 (c)âUsing public funds to pay dues, membership fees, 1623 subscription fees, or charitable contributions to any 1624 nongovernmental agency or other private organization, including 1625 any trade association or organization, that: 1626 1.âAdopts a net zero policy; 1627 2.âRequires adoption of, or any commitment to support, a 1628 net zero policy as a condition of membership or of receiving any 1629 benefit of membership; or 1630 3.âUses such funds to advocate for a net zero policy. 1631 (5)(a)âA governmental entity may not impose any charge, 1632 including a tax, fee, penalty, offset, or assessment, to advance 1633 a net zero policy, including, but not limited to: 1634 1.âA charge based on the carbon content of a fuel. 1635 2.âA charge based on the emission of greenhouse gases that 1636 results from the use, production, or consumption of any product, 1637 service, or activity. 1638 3.âA charge assessed in connection with an emission trading 1639 program. 1640 (b)âEach governmental entity shall annually submit to the 1641 Department of Revenue an affidavit, signed under penalty of 1642 perjury by an authorized official of the governmental entity, 1643 attesting to compliance with this subsection. 1644 (6)âA governmental entity may not implement, administer, or 1645 enforce any program or join any organization that has a policy 1646 of: 1647 (a)âEstablishing a statewide, regional, or geographic limit 1648 or cap on the amount of greenhouse gas emissions which results 1649 from the use, production, or consumption of any product or from 1650 any activity. 1651 (b)âRequiring or incentivizing a governmental entity or any 1652 person in this state to participate in an emissions trading 1653 program. 1654 (7)âThe restrictions of this section do not prevent: 1655 (a)âThe board of a municipality or governmental entity 1656 which owns or operates and directly controls an electric or 1657 natural gas utility from passing rules, regulations, or policies 1658 governing the utility. 1659 (b)âThe Florida Public Service Commission from exercising 1660 its powers and duties to regulate public utilities in accordance 1661 with applicable law. 1662 (c)âA governmental entity from otherwise exercising its 1663 authority as provided by general law, including by implementing 1664 energy policies consistent with the energy policies set forth in 1665 s. 377.601 or implementing local and regional air and water 1666 pollution control programs consistent with the environmental 1667 policies set forth in s. 403.021. 1668 (8)âThis section applies to any proposed action by a 1669 governmental entity on or after July 1, 2026, that is not 1670 otherwise permissible by general law. 1671 Section 30.âEffective February 1, 2027, subsection (3) is 1672 added to section 689.261, Florida Statutes, to read: 1673 689.261âSale of residential property; disclosure of ad 1674 valorem taxes to prospective purchaser.â 1675 (3)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 1676 1.ââListing platformâ means any public-facing online real 1677 property listing service, including, but not limited to, 1678 websites, web applications, and mobile applications. The term 1679 does not include a social media platform as defined in s. 1680 501.2041(1). 1681 2.ââPropertyâ means residential real property located 1682 within this state. 1683 (b)âAny property visible on a listing platform must include 1684 the estimated ad valorem taxes for such property. 1685 1.âIf the ad valorem taxes are estimated using a tax 1686 estimator or buyer payment calculator, the current ownerâs ad 1687 valorem assessment or taxes may not be used to calculate the 1688 estimated ad valorem taxes. The listing platform must calculate 1689 and display the estimated ad valorem taxes using one of the 1690 following methods: 1691 a.âThe ad valorem taxes that would be due if the purchaser 1692 were taxed on the listing price of the property at current 1693 millage rates using the data and formula published under 1694 subparagraph (d)1. The use of such data and formula constitutes 1695 a reasonable estimate of ad valorem taxes. The listing platform 1696 must include a disclaimer on the same website or application as 1697 the estimated ad valorem taxes that the millage rates of 1698 applicable taxing authorities may vary within a county and that 1699 the estimated ad valorem taxes do not include all applicable 1700 non-ad valorem assessments or exemptions, discounts, and other 1701 tax benefits, including, but not limited to, transfer of the 1702 homestead assessment difference under s. 4, Art. VII of the 1703 State Constitution. The current ownerâs and any previous yearsâ 1704 ad valorem taxes on the property may be displayed only as part 1705 of historical tax information. 1706 b.âThe ad valorem taxes that would be due if the purchaser 1707 were taxed on the listing price of the property at the 1708 countywide aggregate average millage rate using the data 1709 published under subparagraph (d)2. The listing platform must 1710 include a link to the property appraiserâs tax estimator for the 1711 county in which the property is located, if available, or to 1712 such property appraiserâs homepage. The Department of Revenue 1713 shall maintain a table of links to each property appraiserâs 1714 homepage and tax estimator, if available, on its website. The 1715 listing platform must include a disclaimer on the same website 1716 or application as the estimated ad valorem taxes stating that 1717 the millage rates of applicable taxing authorities may vary 1718 within a county and that the estimated ad valorem taxes do not 1719 include all applicable non-ad valorem assessments or exemptions, 1720 discounts, and other tax benefits, including, but not limited 1721 to, transfer of the homestead assessment difference under s. 4, 1722 Art. VII of the State Constitution. The current ownerâs and any 1723 previous yearsâ ad valorem taxes on the property may be 1724 displayed only as part of historical tax information. 1725 2.âIf ad valorem taxes are not estimated using a tax 1726 estimator or buyer payment calculator as provided in 1727 subparagraph 1., the listing platform may not display the 1728 current ownerâs ad valorem taxes and must include a link to the 1729 property appraiserâs tax estimator for the county in which the 1730 property is located, if available, or to such property 1731 appraiserâs homepage. The department shall maintain a table of 1732 links to each county property appraiserâs homepage and tax 1733 estimator, if available, on its website. The previous yearâs ad 1734 valorem taxes on the property may not be displayed as part of 1735 historical tax information. 1736 3.âThere is no liability on the part of, and no cause of 1737 action may arise against, any person for an inaccurate 1738 estimation of ad valorem taxes for a property listed on a 1739 listing platform. 1740 (c)âThe current ownerâs ad valorem taxes may not be 1741 included in any printed listing materials concerning a property. 1742 (d)1.âThe department shall develop a formula that may be 1743 used by a listing platform to calculate the estimated ad valorem 1744 taxes required under this subsection. Each county property 1745 appraiser shall provide the department with any information 1746 needed to develop the formula, including, at a minimum, the 1747 county name, tax district code, school district millage rate, 1748 and summary millage rate for all other applicable taxing 1749 authorities. Beginning December 15, 2026, and annually 1750 thereafter, the department shall publish on its website the 1751 formula and the information collected from each property 1752 appraiser under this subparagraph. 1753 2.âThe department shall annually develop a countywide 1754 aggregate average millage rate for each county which may be used 1755 by a listing platform as an alternative method of meeting the 1756 requirements of this subsection. The department shall require 1757 each county property appraiser to provide the department with 1758 any information needed to develop the countywide aggregate 1759 average millage rate. Beginning December 15, 2026, and annually 1760 thereafter, the department shall publish on its website the 1761 countywide aggregate average millage rate and the information 1762 collected from each property appraiser under this subparagraph. 1763 (e)âThe department may adopt rules to implement paragraph 1764 (d). 1765 Section 31.âSubsection (9) of section 1011.71, Florida 1766 Statutes, is amended to read: 1767 1011.71âDistrict school tax.â 1768 (9)âIn addition to the maximum millage levied under this 1769 section and the General Appropriations Act, a school district 1770 may levy, by local referendum or in a general election, 1771 additional millage for school operational purposes up to an 1772 amount that, when combined with nonvoted millage levied under 1773 this section, does not exceed the 10-mill limit established in 1774 s. 9(b), Art. VII of the State Constitution. Any such levy shall 1775 be for a maximum of 4 years and shall be counted as part of the 1776 10-mill limit established in s. 9(b), Art. VII of the State 1777 Constitution. For the purpose of distributing taxes collected 1778 pursuant to this subsection, the term âschool operational 1779 purposesâ includes charter schools sponsored by a school 1780 district. Millage elections conducted under the authority 1781 granted pursuant to this section are subject to s. 1011.73. 1782 Funds generated by such additional millage do not become a part 1783 of the calculation of the Florida Education Finance Program 1784 total potential funds in 2001-2002 or any subsequent year and 1785 must not be incorporated in the calculation of any hold-harmless 1786 or other component of the Florida Education Finance Program 1787 formula in any year. If an increase in required local effort, 1788 when added to existing millage levied under the 10-mill limit, 1789 would result in a combined millage in excess of the 10-mill 1790 limit, any millage levied pursuant to this subsection shall be 1791 considered to be required local effort to the extent that the 1792 district millage would otherwise exceed the 10-mill limit. Funds 1793 levied under this subsection shall be shared with charter 1794 schools based on each charter schoolâs proportionate share of 1795 the districtâs total unweighted full-time equivalent student 1796 enrollment and used in a manner consistent with the purposes of 1797 the levy. The referendum must contain an explanation of the 1798 distribution methodology consistent with the requirements of 1799 this subsection. 1800 Section 32.âThe amendments made by this act to s. 1801 1011.71(9), Florida Statutes, amending the distribution of taxes 1802 collected from certain voted discretionary operating millages 1803 levied by school districts, apply to such levies authorized by a 1804 vote of the electors on or after July 1, 2026. 1805 Section 33.âParagraphs (g), (h), and (r) of subsection (1) 1806 of section 125.01, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1807 125.01âPowers and duties.â 1808 (1)âThe legislative and governing body of a county shall 1809 have the power to carry on county government. To the extent not 1810 inconsistent with general or special law, this power includes, 1811 but is not restricted to, the power to: 1812 (g)âPrepare and enforce comprehensive plans for the 1813 development of the county, to the extent such plans do not 1814 contain the prohibitions in s. 377.817. 1815 (h)âEstablish, coordinate, and enforce zoning and such 1816 business regulations as are necessary for the protection of the 1817 public, to the extent such zoning and business regulations do 1818 not include the prohibitions in s. 377.817. 1819 (r)âLevy and collect taxes, both for county purposes and 1820 for the providing of municipal services within any municipal 1821 service taxing unit, and special assessments; borrow and expend 1822 money; and issue bonds, revenue certificates, and other 1823 obligations of indebtedness, excluding the prohibitions in s. 1824 377.817, which power shall be exercised in such manner, and 1825 subject to such limitations, as may be provided by general law. 1826 A There shall be no referendum is not required for the levy by a 1827 county of ad valorem taxes, both for county purposes and for the 1828 providing of municipal services within any municipal service 1829 taxing unit. 1830 1.âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, a county may 1831 not levy special assessments on lands classified as agricultural 1832 lands under s. 193.461 unless the revenue from such assessments 1833 has been pledged for debt service and is necessary to meet 1834 obligations of bonds or certificates issued by the county which 1835 remain outstanding on July 1, 2023, including refundings thereof 1836 for debt service savings where the maturity of the debt is not 1837 extended. For bonds or certificates issued after July 1, 2023, 1838 special assessments securing such bonds may not be levied on 1839 lands classified as agricultural under s. 193.461. 1840 2.âThe provisions of Subparagraph 1. does do not apply to 1841 residential structures and their curtilage. 1842 Section 34.âSubsection (2) of section 166.021, Florida 1843 Statutes, is amended to read: 1844 166.021âPowers.â 1845 (2)ââMunicipal purposeâ means any activity or power which 1846 may be exercised by the state or its political subdivisions. The 1847 term does not include any activity or power exercised relating 1848 to the prohibitions in s. 377.817. 1849 Section 35.âSection 166.201, Florida Statutes, is amended 1850 to read: 1851 166.201âTaxes and charges.âSubject to the prohibitions in 1852 s. 377.817, a municipality may raise, by taxation and licenses 1853 authorized by the constitution or general law, or by user 1854 charges or fees authorized by ordinance, amounts of money which 1855 are necessary for the conduct of municipal government and may 1856 enforce their receipt and collection in the manner prescribed by 1857 ordinance not inconsistent with law. 1858 Section 36.âSection 212.205, Florida Statutes, is amended 1859 to read: 1860 212.205âSales tax distribution reporting.âBy March 15 of 1861 each year, each person who received a distribution pursuant to 1862 s. 212.20(6)(d)7.b. and c. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.b. and c. in the 1863 preceding calendar year shall report to the Office of Economic 1864 and Demographic Research the following information: 1865 (1)âAn itemized accounting of all expenditures of the funds 1866 distributed in the preceding calendar year, including amounts 1867 spent on debt service. 1868 (2)âA statement indicating what portion of the distributed 1869 funds have been pledged for debt service. 1870 (3)âThe original principal amount and current debt service 1871 schedule of any bonds or other borrowing for which the 1872 distributed funds have been pledged for debt service. 1873 Section 37.âParagraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (3) of 1874 section 288.11621, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1875 288.11621âSpring training baseball franchises.â 1876 (3)âUSE OF FUNDS.â 1877 (a)âA certified applicant may use funds provided under s. 1878 212.20(6)(d)7.b. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.b. only to: 1879 1.âServe the public purpose of acquiring, constructing, 1880 reconstructing, or renovating a facility for a spring training 1881 franchise. 1882 2.âPay or pledge for the payment of debt service on, or to 1883 fund debt service reserve funds, arbitrage rebate obligations, 1884 or other amounts payable with respect thereto, bonds issued for 1885 the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, or renovation of 1886 such facility, or for the reimbursement of such costs or the 1887 refinancing of bonds issued for such purposes. 1888 3.âAssist in the relocation of a spring training franchise 1889 from one unit of local government to another only if the 1890 governing board of the current host local government by a 1891 majority vote agrees to relocation. 1892 (d)1.âAll certified applicants must place unexpended state 1893 funds received pursuant to s. 212.20(6)(d)7.b. s. 1894 212.20(6)(d)6.b. in a trust fund or separate account for use 1895 only as authorized in this section. 1896 2.âA certified applicant may request that the Department of 1897 Revenue suspend further distributions of state funds made 1898 available under s. 212.20(6)(d)7.b. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.b. for 12 1899 months after expiration of an existing agreement with a spring 1900 training franchise to provide the certified applicant with an 1901 opportunity to enter into a new agreement with a spring training 1902 franchise, at which time the distributions shall resume. 1903 3.âThe expenditure of state funds distributed to an 1904 applicant certified before July 1, 2010, must begin within 48 1905 months after the initial receipt of the state funds. In 1906 addition, the construction of, or capital improvements to, a 1907 spring training facility must be completed within 24 months 1908 after the projectâs commencement. 1909 Section 38.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) and paragraphs 1910 (a), (c), and (d) of subsection (3) of section 288.11631, 1911 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1912 288.11631âRetention of Major League Baseball spring 1913 training baseball franchises.â 1914 (2)âCERTIFICATION PROCESS.â 1915 (c)âEach applicant certified on or after July 1, 2013, 1916 shall enter into an agreement with the department which: 1917 1.âSpecifies the amount of the state incentive funding to 1918 be distributed. The amount of state incentive funding per 1919 certified applicant may not exceed $20 million. However, if a 1920 certified applicantâs facility is used by more than one spring 1921 training franchise, the maximum amount may not exceed $50 1922 million, and the Department of Revenue shall make distributions 1923 to the applicant pursuant to s. 212.20(6)(d)7.c. s. 1924 212.20(6)(d)6.c. 1925 2.âStates the criteria that the certified applicant must 1926 meet in order to remain certified. These criteria must include a 1927 provision stating that the spring training franchise must 1928 reimburse the state for any funds received if the franchise does 1929 not comply with the terms of the contract. If bonds were issued 1930 to construct or renovate a facility for a spring training 1931 franchise, the required reimbursement must be equal to the total 1932 amount of state distributions expected to be paid from the date 1933 the franchise violates the agreement with the applicant through 1934 the final maturity of the bonds. 1935 3.âStates that the certified applicant is subject to 1936 decertification if the certified applicant fails to comply with 1937 this section or the agreement. 1938 4.âStates that the department may recover state incentive 1939 funds if the certified applicant is decertified. 1940 5.âSpecifies the information that the certified applicant 1941 must report to the department. 1942 6.âIncludes any provision deemed prudent by the department. 1943 (3)âUSE OF FUNDS.â 1944 (a)âA certified applicant may use funds provided under s. 1945 212.20(6)(d)7.c. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.c. only to: 1946 1.âServe the public purpose of constructing or renovating a 1947 facility for a spring training franchise. 1948 2.âPay or pledge for the payment of debt service on, or to 1949 fund debt service reserve funds, arbitrage rebate obligations, 1950 or other amounts payable with respect thereto, bonds issued for 1951 the construction or renovation of such facility, or for the 1952 reimbursement of such costs or the refinancing of bonds issued 1953 for such purposes. 1954 (c)âThe Department of Revenue may not distribute funds 1955 under s. 212.20(6)(d)7.c. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.c. until July 1, 1956 2016. Further, the Department of Revenue may not distribute 1957 funds to an applicant certified on or after July 1, 2013, until 1958 it receives notice from the department that: 1959 1.âThe certified applicant has encumbered funds under 1960 either subparagraph (a)1. or subparagraph (a)2.; and 1961 2.âIf applicable, any existing agreement with a spring 1962 training franchise for the use of a facility has expired. 1963 (d)1.âAll certified applicants shall place unexpended state 1964 funds received pursuant to s. 212.20(6)(d)7.c. s. 1965 212.20(6)(d)6.c. in a trust fund or separate account for use 1966 only as authorized in this section. 1967 2.âA certified applicant may request that the department 1968 notify the Department of Revenue to suspend further 1969 distributions of state funds made available under s. 1970 212.20(6)(d)7.c. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.c. for 12 months after 1971 expiration of an existing agreement with a spring training 1972 franchise to provide the certified applicant with an opportunity 1973 to enter into a new agreement with a spring training franchise, 1974 at which time the distributions shall resume. 1975 3.âThe expenditure of state funds distributed to an 1976 applicant certified after July 1, 2013, must begin within 48 1977 months after the initial receipt of the state funds. In 1978 addition, the construction or renovation of a spring training 1979 facility must be completed within 24 months after the projectâs 1980 commencement. 1981 Section 39.âSubsection (1) of section 443.191, Florida 1982 Statutes, is amended to read: 1983 443.191âUnemployment Compensation Trust Fund; establishment 1984 and control.â 1985 (1)âThere is established, as a separate trust fund apart 1986 from all other public funds of this state, an Unemployment 1987 Compensation Trust Fund, which shall be administered by the 1988 Department of Commerce exclusively for the purposes of this 1989 chapter. The fund must consist of all of the following: 1990 (a)âAll contributions and reimbursements collected under 1991 this chapter.; 1992 (b)âInterest earned on any moneys in the fund.; 1993 (c)âAny property or securities acquired through the use of 1994 moneys belonging to the fund.; 1995 (d)âAll earnings of these properties or securities.; 1996 (e)âAll money credited to this stateâs account in the 1997 federal Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund under 42 U.S.C. s. 1998 1103.; 1999 (f)âAll money collected for penalties imposed pursuant to 2000 s. 443.151(6)(a).; 2001 (g)âAdvances on the amount in the federal Unemployment 2002 Compensation Trust Fund credited to the state under 42 U.S.C. s. 2003 1321, as requested by the Governor or the Governorâs designee.; 2004 and 2005 (h)âAll money deposited in this account as a distribution 2006 pursuant to s. 212.20(6)(d)7.e. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.e. 2007 2008 Except as otherwise provided in s. 443.1313(4), all moneys in 2009 the fund must be mingled and undivided. 2010 Section 40.âSection 571.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to 2011 read: 2012 571.26âFlorida Agricultural Promotional Campaign Trust 2013 Fund.âThere is hereby created the Florida Agricultural 2014 Promotional Campaign Trust Fund within the Department of 2015 Agriculture and Consumer Services to receive all moneys related 2016 to the Florida Agricultural Promotional Campaign. Moneys 2017 deposited in the trust fund shall be appropriated for the sole 2018 purpose of implementing the Florida Agricultural Promotional 2019 Campaign, except for money deposited in the trust fund pursuant 2020 to s. 212.20(6)(d)7.e. s. 212.20(6)(d)6.e., which shall be held 2021 separately and used solely for the purposes identified in s. 2022 571.265. 2023 Section 41.âSubsection (2) of section 571.265, Florida 2024 Statutes, is amended to read: 2025 571.265âPromotion of Florida thoroughbred breeding and of 2026 thoroughbred racing at Florida thoroughbred tracks; distribution 2027 of funds.â 2028 (2)âFunds deposited into the Florida Agricultural 2029 Promotional Campaign Trust Fund pursuant to s. 212.20(6)(d)7.e. 2030 s. 212.20(6)(d)6.e. shall be used by the department to encourage 2031 the agricultural activity of breeding thoroughbred racehorses in 2032 this state and to enhance thoroughbred racing conducted at 2033 thoroughbred tracks in this state as provided in this section. 2034 If the funds made available under this section are not fully 2035 used in any one fiscal year, any unused amounts shall be carried 2036 forward in the trust fund into future fiscal years and made 2037 available for distribution as provided in this section. 2038 Section 42.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2039 made by this act to section 163.387, Florida Statutes, in a 2040 reference thereto, subsection (9) of section 259.042, Florida 2041 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2042 259.042âTax increment financing for conservation lands.â 2043 (9)âThe public bodies and taxing authorities listed in s. 2044 163.387(2)(c), school districts, and special districts that levy 2045 ad valorem taxes within a tax increment area are exempt from 2046 this section. 2047 Section 43.âEffective October 1, 2026, for the purpose of 2048 incorporating the amendment made by this act to section 212.05, 2049 Florida Statutes, in a reference thereto, section 203.0011, 2050 Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2051 203.0011âCombined rate for tax collected pursuant to ss. 2052 203.01(1)(b)4. and 212.05(1)(e)1.c.âIn complying with the 2053 amendments to ss. 203.01 and 212.05, relating to the additional 2054 tax on electrical power or energy, made by this act, a seller of 2055 electrical power or energy may collect a combined rate of 6.95 2056 percent, which consists of the 4.35 percent and 2.6 percent 2057 required under ss. 212.05(1)(e)1.c. and 203.01(1)(b)4., 2058 respectively, if the provider properly reflects the tax 2059 collected with respect to the two provisions as required in the 2060 return to the Department of Revenue. 2061 Section 44.âEffective October 1, 2026, for the purpose of 2062 incorporating the amendment made by this act to section 212.05, 2063 Florida Statutes, in a reference thereto, section 212.05011, 2064 Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2065 212.05011âCombined rate for tax collected pursuant to ss. 2066 203.01(1)(b)4. and 212.05(1)(e)1.c.âIn complying with the 2067 amendments to ss. 203.01 and 212.05, relating to the additional 2068 tax on electrical power or energy, made by this act, a seller of 2069 electrical power or energy may collect a combined rate of 6.95 2070 percent, which consists of the 4.35 percent and 2.6 percent 2071 required under ss. 212.05(1)(e)1.c. and 203.01(1)(b)4., 2072 respectively, if the provider properly reflects the tax 2073 collected with respect to the two provisions as required in the 2074 return to the Department of Revenue. 2075 Section 45.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2076 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2077 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of section 2078 125.0104, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2079 125.0104âTourist development tax; procedure for levying; 2080 authorized uses; referendum; enforcement.â 2081 (5)âAUTHORIZED USES OF REVENUE.â 2082 (c)âA county located adjacent to the Gulf of America or the 2083 Atlantic Ocean, except a county that receives revenue from taxes 2084 levied pursuant to s. 125.0108, which meets the following 2085 criteria may use up to 10 percent of the tax revenue received 2086 pursuant to this section to reimburse expenses incurred in 2087 providing public safety services, including emergency medical 2088 services as defined in s. 401.107(3), and law enforcement 2089 services, which are needed to address impacts related to 2090 increased tourism and visitors to an area. However, if taxes 2091 collected pursuant to this section are used to reimburse 2092 emergency medical services or public safety services for tourism 2093 or special events, the governing board of a county or 2094 municipality may not use such taxes to supplant the normal 2095 operating expenses of an emergency medical services department, 2096 a fire department, a sheriffâs office, or a police department. 2097 To receive reimbursement, the county must: 2098 1.a.âGenerate a minimum of $10 million in annual proceeds 2099 from any tax, or any combination of taxes, authorized to be 2100 levied pursuant to this section; 2101 b.âHave at least three municipalities; and 2102 c.âHave an estimated population of less than 275,000, 2103 according to the most recent population estimate prepared 2104 pursuant to s. 186.901, excluding the inmate population; or 2105 2.âBe a fiscally constrained county as described in s. 2106 218.67(1). 2107 2108 The board of county commissioners must by majority vote approve 2109 reimbursement made pursuant to this paragraph upon receipt of a 2110 recommendation from the tourist development council. 2111 Section 46.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2112 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2113 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 193.624, Florida 2114 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2115 193.624âAssessment of renewable energy source devices.â 2116 (3)âThis section applies to the installation of a renewable 2117 energy source device installed on or after January 1, 2013, to 2118 new and existing residential real property. This section applies 2119 to a renewable energy source device installed on or after 2120 January 1, 2018, to all other real property, except when 2121 installed as part of a project planned for a location in a 2122 fiscally constrained county, as defined in s. 218.67(1), and for 2123 which an application for a comprehensive plan amendment or 2124 planned unit development zoning has been filed with the county 2125 on or before December 31, 2017. 2126 Section 47.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2127 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2128 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 196.182, Florida 2129 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2130 196.182âExemption of renewable energy source devices.â 2131 (2)âThe exemption provided in this section does not apply 2132 to a renewable energy source device that is installed as part of 2133 a project planned for a location in a fiscally constrained 2134 county, as defined in s. 218.67(1), and for which an application 2135 for a comprehensive plan amendment or planned unit development 2136 zoning has been filed with the county on or before December 31, 2137 2017. 2138 Section 48.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2139 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2140 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 218.12, Florida 2141 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2142 218.12âAppropriations to offset reductions in ad valorem 2143 tax revenue in fiscally constrained counties.â 2144 (1)âBeginning in fiscal year 2008-2009, the Legislature 2145 shall appropriate moneys to offset the reductions in ad valorem 2146 tax revenue experienced by fiscally constrained counties, as 2147 defined in s. 218.67(1), which occur as a direct result of the 2148 implementation of revisions of Art. VII of the State 2149 Constitution approved in the special election held on January 2150 29, 2008. The moneys appropriated for this purpose shall be 2151 distributed in January of each fiscal year among the fiscally 2152 constrained counties based on each countyâs proportion of the 2153 total reduction in ad valorem tax revenue resulting from the 2154 implementation of the revision. 2155 Section 49.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2156 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2157 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 218.125, Florida 2158 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2159 218.125âOffset for tax loss associated with certain 2160 constitutional amendments affecting fiscally constrained 2161 counties.â 2162 (1)âBeginning in the 2010-2011 fiscal year, the Legislature 2163 shall appropriate moneys to offset the reductions in ad valorem 2164 tax revenue experienced by fiscally constrained counties, as 2165 defined in s. 218.67(1), which occur as a direct result of the 2166 implementation of revisions of ss. 3(f) and 4(b), Art. VII of 2167 the State Constitution which were approved in the general 2168 election held in November 2008. The moneys appropriated for this 2169 purpose shall be distributed in January of each fiscal year 2170 among the fiscally constrained counties based on each countyâs 2171 proportion of the total reduction in ad valorem tax revenue 2172 resulting from the implementation of the revisions. 2173 Section 50.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2174 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2175 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 218.135, Florida 2176 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2177 218.135âOffset for tax loss associated with reductions in 2178 value of certain citrus fruit packing and processing equipment.â 2179 (1)âFor the 2018-2019 fiscal year, the Legislature shall 2180 appropriate moneys to offset the reductions in ad valorem tax 2181 revenue experienced by fiscally constrained counties, as defined 2182 in s. 218.67(1), which occur as a direct result of the 2183 implementation of s. 193.4516. The moneys appropriated for this 2184 purpose shall be distributed in January 2019 among the fiscally 2185 constrained counties based on each countyâs proportion of the 2186 total reduction in ad valorem tax revenue resulting from the 2187 implementation of s. 193.4516. 2188 Section 51.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2189 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2190 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 218.136, Florida 2191 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2192 218.136âOffset for ad valorem revenue loss affecting 2193 fiscally constrained counties.â 2194 (1)âBeginning in fiscal year 2025-2026, the Legislature 2195 shall appropriate moneys to offset the reductions in ad valorem 2196 tax revenue experienced by fiscally constrained counties, as 2197 defined in s. 218.67(1), which occur as a direct result of the 2198 implementation of revisions of s. 6(a), Art. VII of the State 2199 Constitution approved in the November 2024 general election. The 2200 moneys appropriated for this purpose shall be distributed in 2201 January of each fiscal year among the fiscally constrained 2202 counties based on each countyâs proportion of the total 2203 reduction in ad valorem tax revenue resulting from the 2204 implementation of the revision of s. 6(a), Art. VII of the State 2205 Constitution. 2206 Section 52.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2207 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2208 reference thereto, paragraph (cc) of subsection (2) of section 2209 252.35, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2210 252.35âEmergency management powers; Division of Emergency 2211 Management.â 2212 (2)âThe division is responsible for carrying out the 2213 provisions of ss. 252.31-252.90. In performing its duties, the 2214 division shall: 2215 (cc)âAdminister a revolving loan program for local 2216 government hazard mitigation projects. 2217 Section 53.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2218 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2219 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 2220 288.0655, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2221 288.0655âRural Infrastructure Fund.â 2222 (2) 2223 (b)âTo facilitate access of rural communities and rural 2224 areas of opportunity as defined by the Rural Economic 2225 Development Initiative to infrastructure funding programs of the 2226 Federal Government, such as those offered by the United States 2227 Department of Agriculture and the United States Department of 2228 Commerce, and state programs, including those offered by Rural 2229 Economic Development Initiative agencies, and to facilitate 2230 local government or private infrastructure funding efforts, the 2231 department may award grants for up to 75 percent of the total 2232 infrastructure project cost, or up to 100 percent of the total 2233 infrastructure project cost for a project located in a rural 2234 community as defined in s. 288.0656(2) which is also located in 2235 a fiscally constrained county as defined in s. 218.67(1) or a 2236 rural area of opportunity as defined in s. 288.0656(2). Eligible 2237 uses of funds may include improving any inadequate 2238 infrastructure that has resulted in regulatory action that 2239 prohibits economic or community growth and reducing the costs to 2240 community users of proposed infrastructure improvements that 2241 exceed such costs in comparable communities. Eligible uses of 2242 funds include improvements to public infrastructure for 2243 industrial or commercial sites and upgrades to or development of 2244 public tourism infrastructure. Authorized infrastructure may 2245 include the following public or public-private partnership 2246 facilities: storm water systems; telecommunications facilities; 2247 roads or other remedies to transportation impediments; nature 2248 based tourism facilities; or other physical requirements 2249 necessary to facilitate tourism, trade, and economic development 2250 activities in the community. Authorized infrastructure may also 2251 include publicly or privately owned self-powered nature-based 2252 tourism facilities, publicly owned telecommunications 2253 facilities, and additions to the distribution facilities of the 2254 existing natural gas utility as defined in s. 366.04(3)(c), the 2255 existing electric utility as defined in s. 366.02, or the 2256 existing water or wastewater utility as defined in s. 2257 367.021(12), or any other existing water or wastewater facility, 2258 which owns a gas or electric distribution system or a water or 2259 wastewater system in this state when: 2260 1.âA contribution-in-aid of construction is required to 2261 serve public or public-private partnership facilities under the 2262 tariffs of any natural gas, electric, water, or wastewater 2263 utility as defined herein; and 2264 2.âSuch utilities as defined herein are willing and able to 2265 provide such service. 2266 Section 54.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2267 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2268 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 288.102, Florida 2269 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2270 288.102âSupply Chain Innovation Grant Program.â 2271 (4)âA minimum of a one-to-one match of nonstate resources, 2272 including local, federal, or private funds, to the state 2273 contribution is required. An award may not be made for a project 2274 that is receiving or using state funding from another state 2275 source or statutory program, including tax credits. The one-to 2276 one match requirement is waived for a public entity located in a 2277 fiscally constrained county as defined in s. 218.67(1). 2278 Section 55.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2279 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2280 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of section 2281 339.2816, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2282 339.2816âSmall County Road Assistance Program.â 2283 (4) 2284 (c)âThe following criteria must be used to prioritize road 2285 projects for funding under the program: 2286 1.âThe primary criterion is the physical condition of the 2287 road as measured by the department. 2288 2.âAs secondary criteria the department may consider: 2289 a.âWhether a road is used as an evacuation route. 2290 b.âWhether a road has high levels of agricultural travel. 2291 c.âWhether a road is considered a major arterial route. 2292 d.âWhether a road is considered a feeder road. 2293 e.âWhether a road is located in a fiscally constrained 2294 county, as defined in s. 218.67(1). 2295 f.âOther criteria related to the impact of a project on the 2296 public road system or on the state or local economy as 2297 determined by the department. 2298 Section 56.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2299 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2300 reference thereto, paragraph (h) of subsection (16) of section 2301 403.064, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2302 403.064âReuse of reclaimed water.â 2303 (16)âBy November 1, 2021, domestic wastewater utilities 2304 that dispose of effluent, reclaimed water, or reuse water by 2305 surface water discharge shall submit to the department for 2306 review and approval a plan for eliminating nonbeneficial surface 2307 water discharge by January 1, 2032, subject to the requirements 2308 of this section. The plan must include the average gallons per 2309 day of effluent, reclaimed water, or reuse water that will no 2310 longer be discharged into surface waters and the date of such 2311 elimination, the average gallons per day of surface water 2312 discharge which will continue in accordance with the 2313 alternatives provided for in subparagraphs (a)2. and 3., and the 2314 level of treatment that the effluent, reclaimed water, or reuse 2315 water will receive before being discharged into a surface water 2316 by each alternative. 2317 (h)âThis subsection does not apply to any of the following: 2318 1.âA domestic wastewater treatment facility that is located 2319 in a fiscally constrained county as described in s. 218.67(1). 2320 2.âA domestic wastewater treatment facility that is located 2321 in a municipality that is entirely within a rural area of 2322 opportunity as designated pursuant to s. 288.0656. 2323 3.âA domestic wastewater treatment facility that is located 2324 in a municipality that has less than $10 million in total 2325 revenue, as determined by the municipalityâs most recent annual 2326 financial report submitted to the Department of Financial 2327 Services in accordance with s. 218.32. 2328 4.âA domestic wastewater treatment facility that is 2329 operated by an operator of a mobile home park as defined in s. 2330 723.003 and has a permitted capacity of less than 300,000 2331 gallons per day. 2332 Section 57.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendments 2333 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in 2334 references thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (6) of section 2335 403.0741, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2336 403.0741âGrease waste removal and disposal.â 2337 (6)âREGULATION BY LOCAL GOVERNMENTS.â 2338 (c)âFiscally constrained counties as described in s. 2339 218.67(1) and small counties as defined in s. 339.2818(2) may 2340 opt out of the requirements of this section. 2341 Section 58.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2342 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in 2343 references thereto, subsections (2) and (3) of section 589.08, 2344 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 2345 589.08âLand acquisition restrictions.â 2346 (2)âThe Florida Forest Service may receive, hold the 2347 custody of, and exercise the control of any lands, and set aside 2348 into a separate, distinct and inviolable fund, any proceeds 2349 derived from the sales of the products of such lands, the use 2350 thereof in any manner, or the sale of such lands save the 25 2351 percent of the proceeds to be paid into the State School Fund as 2352 provided by law. The Florida Forest Service may use and apply 2353 such funds for the acquisition, use, custody, management, 2354 development, or improvement of any lands vested in or subject to 2355 the control of the Florida Forest Service. After full payment 2356 has been made for the purchase of a state forest to the Federal 2357 Government or other grantor, 15 percent of the gross receipts 2358 from a state forest shall be paid to the fiscally constrained 2359 county or counties, as described in s. 218.67(1), in which it is 2360 located in proportion to the acreage located in each county for 2361 use by the county or counties for school purposes. 2362 (3)âThe Florida Forest Service shall pay 15 percent of the 2363 gross receipts from the Goethe State Forest to each fiscally 2364 constrained county, as described in s. 218.67(1), in which a 2365 portion of the respective forest is located in proportion to the 2366 forest acreage located in such county. The funds must be equally 2367 divided between the board of county commissioners and the school 2368 board of each fiscally constrained county. 2369 Section 59.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2370 made by this act to section 218.67, Florida Statutes, in a 2371 reference thereto, paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of section 2372 1011.62, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2373 1011.62âFunds for operation of schools.âIf the annual 2374 allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each 2375 district for operation of schools is not determined in the 2376 annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing 2377 the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as 2378 follows: 2379 (1)âCOMPUTATION OF THE BASE FLORIDA EDUCATION FINANCE 2380 PROGRAM.âThe following procedure shall be followed in 2381 determining the base Florida Education Finance Program funds for 2382 each district: 2383 (f)âSmall district factor.âAn additional value per full 2384 time equivalent student membership is provided to each school 2385 district with a full-time equivalent student membership of fewer 2386 than 20,000 full-time equivalent students which is in a fiscally 2387 constrained county as described in s. 218.67(1). The amount of 2388 the additional value shall be specified in the General 2389 Appropriations Act. 2390 Section 60.âHunting, fishing, and camping sales tax 2391 holiday.â 2392 (1)âThe tax levied under chapter 212, Florida Statutes, may 2393 not be collected during the period from September 7, 2026, 2394 through December 31, 2026, on the retail sale of: 2395 (a)âAmmunition, as defined in s. 790.001, Florida Statutes. 2396 (b)âA firearm. For purposes of this section, the term 2397 âfirearmâ means a weapon capable of firing a missile and 2398 includes a pistol, rifle, or shotgun using an explosive charge 2399 as a propellant. 2400 (c)âThe following accessories used for firearms: 2401 1.âCharging handles. 2402 2.âCleaning kits. 2403 3.âHolsters. 2404 4.âPistol grips. 2405 5.âSights or optics. 2406 6.âStocks. 2407 (d)âA bow. For purposes of this section, the term âbowâ 2408 means a device consisting of flexible material having a string 2409 connecting its two ends, either indirectly by cables or pulleys 2410 or directly, for the purpose of discharging arrows; which 2411 propels arrows only by the energy stored by the drawing of the 2412 device; and which is handheld, hand-drawn, and hand-released. 2413 (e)âA crossbow. For purposes of this section, the term 2414 âcrossbowâ means a device consisting of flexible material having 2415 a string connecting its two ends, either indirectly by cables or 2416 pulleys or directly, affixed to a stock for the purpose of 2417 discharging quarrels, bolts, or arrows; which propels quarrels, 2418 bolts, or arrows only by the energy stored by the drawing of the 2419 device; and which uses a non-handheld locking mechanism to 2420 maintain the device in a drawn or ready-to-discharge condition. 2421 (f)âThe following accessories used for bows or crossbows: 2422 1.âArrows. 2423 2.âBolts. 2424 3.âQuarrels. 2425 4.âQuivers. 2426 5.âReleases. 2427 6.âSights or optics. 2428 7.âWristguards. 2429 (g)âCamping supplies. For purposes of this section, the 2430 term âcamping suppliesâ means tents with a sales price of $200 2431 or less; sleeping bags, portable hammocks, camping stoves, and 2432 collapsible camping chairs with a sales price of $50 or less; 2433 and camping lanterns and flashlights with a sales price of $30 2434 or less. 2435 (h)âFishing supplies. For purposes of this section, the 2436 term âfishing suppliesâ means rods and reels with a sales price 2437 of $75 or less if sold individually, or $150 or less if sold as 2438 a set; tackle boxes or bags with a sales price of $30 or less; 2439 and bait or fishing tackle with a sales price of $10 or less if 2440 sold individually, or $20 or less if multiple items are sold 2441 together. The term does not include supplies used for commercial 2442 fishing purposes. 2443 (2)âThe Department of Revenue is authorized, and all 2444 conditions are deemed met, to adopt emergency rules pursuant to 2445 s. 120.54(4), Florida Statutes, for the purpose of implementing 2446 this section. 2447 Section 61.âThe Department of Revenue is authorized, and 2448 all conditions are deemed met, to adopt emergency rules pursuant 2449 to s. 120.54(4), Florida Statutes, for the purpose of 2450 implementing provisions the amendments made to ss. 203.01, 2451 203.012, 212.04, 212.05, 212.08, 212.0516, and 288.062, Florida 2452 Statutes. Notwithstanding any other law, emergency rules adopted 2453 under this section are effective for 6 months after adoption and 2454 may be renewed during the pendency of procedures to adopt 2455 permanent rules addressing the subject of the emergency rules. 2456 Section 62.âThe Department of Commerce is authorized, and 2457 all conditions are deemed met, to adopt emergency rules pursuant 2458 to s. 120.54(4), Florida Statutes, for the purpose of 2459 implementing the amendments made to s. 288.062, Florida 2460 Statutes. Notwithstanding any other law, emergency rules adopted 2461 under this section are effective for 6 months after adoption and 2462 may be renewed during the pendency of procedures to adopt 2463 permanent rules addressing the subject of the emergency rules. 2464 Section 63.âExcept as otherwise provided in this act and 2465 except for this section, which shall take effect upon becoming a 2466 law, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026.